रजिस्ट्री सं. डी.एल. (एन) 04/0007/2003—05 REGD. NO. 0. L. (७) 04/0007/2003—05 
सत्यमेव जयते 


Aid = राजपन्र 


Che Gazette of India 


SSH. -ST.We.-Al.-6062023-24667 
CG-DL-W-6062023-24667 


प्राधिकार से प्रकाशित 
PUBLISHED BY AUTHORITY 


साप्ताहिक 
WEEKLY 


सं. ] नई दिल्ली, जून 4---जून 0, 2023, शनिवार/ जयेष्ठ 4--जयेष्ठ 20, 945 
No. 4] NEW DELHI, JUNE 4—JUNE 0, 2023, SATURDAY/JYAISHTHA 4— JYAISHTHA 20, 945 


इस भाग में भिन्‍न पृष्ठ संख्या दी जाती है जिससे कि यह पृथक संकलन के रूप में रखा जा सके 
Separate Paging is given to this Part in order that it may be filed as a separate compilation 


भाग त---खण्ड 4 
PART II—Section 4 


रक्षा मंत्रालय द्वारा जारी किए गए सांविधिक नियम और आदेश 
Statutory Rules and Orders issued by the Ministry of Defence 


रक्षा मंत्रालय 
अधिसूचना 
नई दिल्‍ली, 24 अप्रैल, 2023 
का.नि.आ. 73.--राष्ट्रपति, संविधान के अनुच्छेद 309 के परंतुक द्वारा प्रदत्त शक्तियों का प्रयोग करते हुये और 
सड़क परिवहन एवं राजमार्ग मंत्रालय, सीमा सड़क विकास मंडल, सामान्य रिजर्व इंजीनियर बल (सीमा सड़क संगठन), 
समूह “ग' पद भर्ती नियम 2042 को, जहां तक उनका संबंध पर्यवेक्षक (प्रशासन) के पद से है, उन बातों के सिवाय 
अधिक्रांत करते हुये, जिन्हें ऐसे अधिक्रमण से पहले किया गया है या करने का लोप किया गया है, रक्षा मंत्रालय, सीमा 


सड़क संगठन, सामान्य रिजर्व इंजीनियर बल में पर्यवेक्षक (प्रशासन) के पद पर भर्ती की पद्धति का विनियमन करने के लिए 
निम्नलिखित नियम बनाती हैं, अर्थात : - 


. संक्षिप्त नाम और प्रारम्भ - () इन नियमों का संक्षिप्त नाम रक्षा मंत्रालय, सीमा सड़क संगठन, सामान्य रिजर्व 
इंजीनियर बल, पर्यवेक्षक (प्रशासन) समूह 'ग' पद भर्ती नियम, 2023 है। 


(2) ये राजपत्र में उनके प्रकाशन की तारीख को प्रवृत्त होंगे। 


3445 GI/2023 (209) 


20 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 [PART II—SEC. 4] 
2. पद की संख्या, वर्गीकरण और वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्‍तर - उक्त पद की संख्या, उसका वर्गीकरण और इससे संलग्न 
वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर वह होगा, जो इन नियमों से उपाबद्ध अनुसूची के स्तंभ (2) से स्तंभ (4) में विनिर्दिष्ट हैं। 
3. भर्ती की पद्धति, आयु-सीमा, अर्हताएं, आदि- उक्त पद पर भर्ती की पद्धति, आयु-सीमा, अर्हताएं और उससे 
संबंधित अन्य बातें वे होंगी जो उक्त अनुसूची के स्तंभ (5) से स्तंभ (3) में विनिर्दिष्ट हैं। 
4. निरहता - वह व्यक्ति 
(क) जिसने ऐसे व्यक्ति से, जिसका पति या जिसकी पत्नी जीवित है, विवाह किया है या विवाह की संविदा की 
है, या 
(ख) जिसने अपने पति या अपनी पत्नी के जीवित रहते हुए किसी अन्य व्यक्ति से विवाह किया है, या विवाह 


की संविदा की है, उक्त पद पर नियुक्ति का पात्र नहीं होगा :- 
परन्तु यदि केन्द्रीय सरकार का यह समाधान हो जाता है कि ऐसा विवाह ऐसे व्यक्ति और विवाह के अन्य पक्षकार 


को लागू care विधि के अधीन अनुज्ञेय है और ऐसा करने के लिए अन्य आधार हैं तो वह किसी व्यक्ति को इस नियम के 
प्रवर्तन से छूट दे सकेगी। 


5. 


शिथिल करने की शक्ति - जहां केन्द्रीय सरकार की यह राय है कि ऐसा करना आवश्यक या समीचीन है, और वहां, 


वह उसके लिए जो कारण हैं उन्हें लेखबद्ध करके इन नियमों के किसी उपबंध को किसी वर्ग या प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों की बाबत, 
आदेश द्वारा शिथिल कर सकेगी। 


6. 


व्यावृति - इन नियमों की कोई बात ऐसे आरक्षण, आयु-सीमा में छूट और अन्य रियायतों पर प्रभाव नहीं डालेगी, 


जिनका केन्द्रीय सरकार द्वारा इस संबंध में समय-समय पर जारी किए गए आदेशों के अनुसार अनुसूचित जातियों, 
अनुसूचित जनजातियों, अन्य पिछड़े वर्गों, भूतपूर्व सैनिकों और अन्य विशेष प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों के लिए उपबंध करना 


अपेक्षित है। 
अनुसूची 
पद का नाम पदों की | वर्गीकरण वेतन मैट्रिक्स | चयन | सीधे भर्ती किए जाने वाले व्यक्तियों के लिए 
संख्या मे स्तर या आयु-सीमा 
अचयन 
पद 
() (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) 
पर्यवेक्षक (प्रशासन)| 74* (2023) | साधारण केंद्रीय | वेतन मैट्रिक्स | अचयन | 8 a 27 वर्ष के बीच 
* कार्यभार के | सेवा, समूह 'ग', | में स्तर-4 केंद्रीय सरकार द्वारा समय-समय पर जारी किए 
आधार पर अराजपत्रित (25,500- गए अनुदेशों या आदेशों के अनुसार सरकारी 
परिवर्तन fear) अननुसचिवीय । | 87,700 र). सेवकों के लिए साधारण अभ्यर्थियों की दशा में 
जा सकता है। शिथिल करके चालीस वर्ष तक, अन्य पिछडे 


वर्गों के अभ्यर्थियों के लिए तैंतालीस वर्ष तक 


और अनुसूचित जातियों, अनुसूचित 
जनजातियों के अभ्यर्थियों के लिए पैंतालीस वर्ष 
तक की जा सकती है। 


टिप्पण : आयु-सीमा आवधारित करने के लिए 
निर्णायक तारीख अभ्यर्थियों से आवेदन प्राप्त 
करने के लिए नियत की गई अंतिम तारीख 
होगी, न कि वह अंतिम तारीख जो असम, 
मेघालय, अरुणाचल प्रदेश, मिजोरम, मणिपुर, 
नागालैंड, त्रिपुरा, सिक्षिम, हिमाचल प्रदेश के 
लाहौल और स्पीति जिले तथा चंबा जिले के 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 


2Il 


पांगी उपखंड और संघ राज्य क्षेत्र लद्दाख, 
अंदमान और निकोबार द्वीप समूह और लक्षद्वीप 


के अभ्यर्थियों के लिए विहित की गई हैं। 

सीधे भर्ती किए जाने वाले व्यक्तियों के |सीधे भर्ती किए परिवीक्षा की | भर्ती की पद्धति: भर्ती सीधे होगी या प्रोन्नति द्वीप या 
लिए अपेक्षित शैक्षिक और अन्य जिने वाले व्यक्तियों | अवधि, यदि | प्रतिनियुक्ति या आमेलन द्वीप तथा विभिन्न पद्धतियों 
HEAT | के लिए अपेक्षित |कोई हो। द्वीप भरी जाने वाली रिक्तियों की प्रतिशत । 

शैक्षिक और अन्य 

HEAT और प्रोन्नत 

व्यक्तियों की दशा 

में लागू होगी या 

नहीं । 

(7) (8) (9) (0) 

(i) किसी मान्यता प्राप्त विश्वविद्यालय | आयु : नहीं सीधे भर्ती (i) बीस प्रतिशत सीधी भर्ती द्वारा; 
या anges से डिग्री; शैक्षिक अर्हता: किए जाने ( अस्सी प्रतिशत प्रोन्नति द्वारा, जिसके न हो सकने 
(i) सेना से राष्ट्रीय Fee कोर 'बी' | नहीं, वाले व्यक्तियों | पर सीधी भर्ती द्वारा। 
प्रमाणपत्र या सेना के पूर्व नायब | लेकिन किसी के लिए दो टिप्पण: सीधी भर्ती की रिक्तियों में से पन्द्रह प्रतिशत 
सूबेदार (जनरल ड्यूटी) या नौसेना या | मान्यता प्राप्त बोर्ड | वर्ष भूतपूर्व सैनिकों के पुनर्नियोजन द्वारा भरे जाएंगे, 
वायु सेना से समतुल्य | या समतुल्य से जिनके पास स्तंभ (7) के अधीन सीधे भर्ती किए जाने 
टिप्पण :- मैट्रिकुलेशन वाले व्यक्तियों के लिए विहित शैक्षिक अर्हताऐ है, 
() सीमा सड़क संगठन के दिशानिर्देशों | प्रमाणपत्र होना जिसके न हो सकने पर सीधी भर्ती द्वारा । 
के अनुसार शारीरिक दक्षता परीक्षा | चाहिए। 


उत्तीर्ण करनी चाहिए; और 
(ii) सीमा सड़क संगठन के दिशानिर्देशों 
के अनुसार शारीरिक और चिकित्सा 


मानकों को पूरा करना चाहिए। 

प्रोन्नति या प्रतिनियुक्ति या आमेलन द्वारा भर्ती की | यदि विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति है तो उसकी संरचना भर्ती करने में 

दशा में वे श्रेणियां जिनसे प्रोन्नति या प्रतिनियुक्ति किन 

या आमेलन किया जाएगा परिस्थतियों में 
संघ लोक सेवा 
आयोग से 
परामर्श किया 
जाएगा 

(4) (72) (73) 

प्रोन्नति: समूह “ग' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति (प्रोन्नति के संबंध में विचार | लागू नहीं 

वेतन मैट्रिक्स के स्तर - 2 (9,900-63,200 करने के लिए) जो निम्नलिखित से मिलकर होता। 

रू.) में ऐसे लीडिंग हैंड (प्रशासन) जिन्होंने उस॒ | बनेगी :- 

श्रेणी में आठ वर्ष नियमित सेवा की हो। 4. संयुक्त निदेशक या समतुल्य - अध्यक्ष; 

eam: जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में, 5 as प्रसाशनिक अधिकारी, या समतुल्य - सदस्य; 

जिन्होंने अपनी अर्हईक या पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर ली 

के मल . | 3. केन्द्रीय सरकार के किसी अन्य मंत्रालय या 
है, प्रोन्नति के लिए विचार किया जा रहा हो, वहां fram मे रे अधिकारी: ह 
उनसे ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में भी विचारकिया Oe Fe, aan 


22 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 [PART II—SEc. 4] 


जाएगा, परन्तु यह तब जब कि उनके द्वारा की गई | समूह 'ग' विभागीय पुष्टि समिति (पुष्टि के संबंध में विचार करने 
ऐसी अहक या पात्रता सेवा, अपेक्षित अर्क या | के लिए) जो निम्नलिखित से मिलकर बनेगी :- 


पात्रता सेवा के आधे से अधिक से या दो वर्ष से, | 7. sae निदेशक या समतुल्य - अध्यक्ष; 
इनमें से जो भी कम हों, कम न हो और उन्होंने | 2. ज्येष्ठ प्रसाशनिक अधिकारी, या समतुल्य - सदस्य; 
अपने ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों सहित, जिन्होंने ऐसी | 3. केन्द्रीय सरकार के किसी अन्य मंत्रालय या 

Hen पात्रता सेवा पहले ही पूरी कर ली है, | विभाग से समूह 'क' अधिकारी ; - सदस्य। 


अगली उच्चतर श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के लिए अपनी 
परिवीक्षा की अवधि सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली 
हो। 


[फा. सं. बी.आर.डी.बी/04/05/2024/जी ई-4/46/आर आर/र.(नि.)/2023] 
देवेन्द्र कुमार, अवर सचिव 


MINISTRY OF DEFENCE 
NOTIFICATION 
New Delhi, the 2ist April, 2023 


S.R.O. 73.—In exercise of the powers conferred by the proviso to article 309 of the Constitution and in 
supersession of the Ministry of Road Transport and Highways, Border Roads Development Board, General Reserve 
Engineer Force (Border Roads Organisation), Group ‘C’ Posts Recruitment Rules, 202, in so far as they relate to the 
post of Supervisor (Administration), except as respects things done or omitted to be done before such supersession, 
the President hereby makes the following rules regulating the method of recruitment to the post of Supervisor 
(Administration) in the Ministry of Defence, Border Roads Organisation, General Reserve Engineer Force, namely :- 


l. Short title and commencement.—(l) These rules may be called the Ministry of Defence, Border Roads 
Organisation, General Reserve Engineer Force, Supervisor (Administration) Group ‘C’ Post, Recruitment Rules, 
2023. 


(2) They shall come into force on the date of their publication in the Official Gazette. 


2. Number of posts, classification and level in pay matrix.—The number of the said post, its classification and 
level in the pay matrix attached thereto shall be as specified in columns (2) to (4) of the Schedule annexed to 
these rules. 


3. Method of recruitment, age-limit, qualifications, etc.—The method of recruitment to the said post, age-limit, 
qualifications and other matters relating to the said post shall be as specified in columns (5 ) to (3) of the said 
Schedule. 


4. Disqualification.— No person,— 
(a) who has entered into or contracted a marriage with a person having a spouse living ; or 


b) who, having a spouse living, has entered into or contracted a marriage with any person, shall be eligible for 
appointment to the said post: 


Provided that the Central Government may, if satisfied, that such marriage is permissible under the personal 
law applicable to such person and the other party to the marriage, and that there are other grounds for so doing, 
exempt any person from the operation of this rule. 


5. Power to relax.— Where the Central Government is of the opinion that it is necessary or expedient so to do, it 
may, by order and for reasons to be recorded in writing, relax any of the provisions of these rules with respect to 
any class or category of persons. 


6. Saving.— Nothing in these rules shall affect reservation, relaxation of age-limit and other concessions required to 
be provided for the Scheduled Castes, the Scheduled Tribes, Other Backward Classes, Ex-servicemen and other 
special categories of persons, in accordance with the orders issued by the Central Government from time to time 
in this regard. 


[भाग II—eave 4] भारत का UAT : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 23 
SCHEDULE 
Name of post. Number of | Classification | Level Whether | Age -limit for direct recruits. 
posts. in pay selection 
matrix. | post or 
non- 
selection 
post. 
d) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) 
Supervisor 74* (2023) | General Level-4 | Non- Between 8 and 27 years. 
(Administration) | *Subject to | Central in the selection | Relaxable for Government servants up to 
variation Service, pay forty years in case of general candidates, 
dependent Group ‘C’, matrix forty-three years in case of candidates 
on Non-Gazetted, | (R- belonging to Other Backward Classes 
workload. Non- 25,500- and up to forty- five years in case of 
Ministerial. 8,00) candidates belonging to the Scheduled 
Castes and the Scheduled Tribes in 
accordance with instructions or orders 
issued by the Central Government from 
time to time. 
Note: The crucial date for determining 
the age-limit shall be the closing date for 
receipt of applications from candidates 
and not the closing date prescribed for 
those in Assam, Meghalaya, Arunachal 
Pradesh, Mizoram, Manipur, Nagaland, 
Tripura, Sikkim, Lahaul भाव Spiti 
District and Pangi Sub-Division of 
Chamba District of Himachal Pradesh 
and the Union territories of Ladakh, 
Andaman and Nicobar Islands and 
Lakshadweep. 
Educational and other qualifications | Whether age and Period of Method of recruitment whether 
required for direct recruits. educational probation, | by direct recruitment or by 
qualifications if any. promotion or by 


prescribed for 
direct recruits will 


deputation/absorption and 
percentage of the vacancies to 


apply in the case of be filled by various methods. 
promotees. 
(7) (8) (9) (0) 
(i) Degree from a recognised University | Age : No Two years (i) Twenty per cent. By direct 
or equivalent; Educational for direct recruitment; 
recruits 


(ii) Possessing National Cadet Corps ‘B’ 
Certificate or Ex-Naib Subedar (General 
Duty) from the Army or equivalent from 
Navy or Air Force. 

Note :- 

(i) Should qualify Physical Efficiency 
tests as per Border Roads Organisations 
guidelines; and 

(ii) Should meet Physical and Medical 


Standards as per Border Roads 
Organisation guidelines. 


qualification : No, 
but must possess 
matriculation 
certificate from a 
recognised Board or 
equivalent. 


(ii) Eighty per cent. By 
promotion, failing which by direct 
recruitment. 

Note: Fifteen per cent, of the 
direct recruitment vacancies shall 
be filled by re-employment of ex- 
servicemen, possessing the 
educational qualifications 
prescribed for direct recruits under 
column (7), failing which by 
direct recruitment. 


24 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 


[PART II—SEC. 4] 


In case of recruitment by 
promotion or 
deputation/absorption, grades 
from which promotion or 


If a Departmental Promotion Committee 
exists, what is its composition. 


Circumstances in which 
Union Public Service 
Commission is to be 
consulted in making 


deputation/absorption is to be recruitment. 
made. 
d)) (2) (3) 
Promotion: Group 'C' Departmental Promotion | Not applicable. 
Leading Hand (Administration) in | Committee (for considering Promotion) 
Level-2 in the pay matrix | consisting of:- 
Rs.9,900-63,200) with eight years | l. Joint Director or equivalent rank - Chairman; 
regular service in the grade. 2. Senior Administrative Officer or 
Note : Where juniors who have | equivalent rank — Member; 
completed their qualifying or | 3. A Group ’A’ Officer from any other 
eligibility service are being | Ministry or Department of the Central 
considered for promotion, their | Government - Member. 


seniors shall also be considered 
provided they are not short of the 
requisite qualifying or eligibility 
service by more than half of such 
qualifying or eligibility service or 
two years, whichever is less and 
have successfully completed their 
probation period for promotion to 
the next higher grade along with 
juniors who have already 
completed such qualifying or 
eligibility service. 


Group ‘C’ Departmental Confirmation 
Committee (for considering confirmation) 
consisting of : - 


l. Joint Director or equivalent rank — Chairman; 
2. Senior Administrative Officer 

or equivalent rank — Member; 
3. A Group ’A’ Officer from any other 

Ministry or Department of the Central 
Government - Member. 


[F. No. BRDB/0/05/202/GE-/46/RR/D (A)/2023] 
DEVENDRA KUMAR, Under Secy. 


(वित्त प्रभाग) 
अधिसूचना 
नई दिल्‍ली, 30 मई, 2023 


का.नि.आ. 74.--राष्ट्रपति, संविधान के अनुच्छेद 309 के परन्तुक द्वारा प्रदत्त शक्तियों का प्रयोग करते हुए और 
रक्षा लेखा विभाग (लेखापरीक्षक) भर्ती नियम, 2009 का अधिक्रमण करते हुए, उन बातों के सिवाय अधिक्रांत करते हुए 
जिन्हें ऐसे अधिक्रमण से पूर्व किया गया है या करने का लोप किया गया है, रक्षा लेखा विभाग में लेखापरीक्षक के पद पर 
भर्ती की पद्धति को विनियमन करने के लिए निम्नलिखित नियम बनाती हैं, अर्थात्‌ :- 


4. संक्षिप्त नाम और प्रारंभ:- 


({) इन नियमों का संक्षिप्त नाम रक्षा लेखा विभाग (लेखापरीक्षक) भर्ती नियम, 2022 है। 


(2) ये राजपत्र में उनके प्रकाशन की तारीख को प्रवृत्त होंगे। 


2. पदों की संख्या, वर्गीकरण और वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर :- उक्त पदों की संख्या, इसका वर्गीकरण और वेतन मैट्रिक्स में 
स्तर वे होंगे जो इन नियमों के साथ संलग्न अनुसूची के स्तम्भों (2) से (4) में विनिर्दिष्ट हैं। 


3. भर्ती की पद्धति, आयु सीमा, अर्ईताएं आदि :- पूर्वोक्त पद के लिए भर्ती की पद्धति, आयु सीमा, अर्हताएं और उससे 


संबंधित अन्य बाते वे होंगी जो उक्त अनुसूची के स्तम्भ (5) से स्तम्भ (2) में विनिर्दिष्ट हैं। 


4. निरहताएं :- कोई व्यक्ति- 


(क) जिसने ऐसे व्यक्ति से जिसका पति या जिसकी पत्नी जीवित है, विवाह किया है, या विवाह की संविदा की है; या 


(ख) जिसने अपने पति या अपनी पत्नी के जीवित होते हुए किसी व्यक्ति से विवाह किया है या विवाह की संविदा की है, 
उक्त सेवा में नियुक्ति का पात्र नहीं होगा। 


[भाग —ave 4] भारत FT UAT : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 25 
परन्तु यदि केन्द्रीय सरकार का समाधान हो जाता है कि ऐसा विवाह ऐसे व्यक्ति और विवाह के अन्य पक्षकार को 
लागू cate विधि के अधीन अनुज्ञेय है और ऐसा करने के लिए अन्य आधार है तो वह किसी व्यक्ति को इस नियम के प्रवर्तन 
से छूट दे सकेगी। 
5. शिथिल करने की शक्ति :- जहां केन्द्रीय सरकार की यह राय हो कि ऐसा करना आवश्यक या समीचीन है, वहाँ वह उसके 
लिए जो कारण हैं उन्हें लेखबद्ध करके, इन नियमों के किसी उपबंध को किसी वर्ग या प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों की बाबत, 
आदेश द्वारा शिथिल कर सकेगी। 


6. व्यावृत्ति :- इन नियमों की कोई बात, ऐसे आरक्षण, आयु सीमा में छूट और अन्य रियायतों पर प्रभाव नहीं डालेगी, 
जिनका केन्द्रीय सरकार द्वारा इस संबंध में समय-समय पर निकाले गए आदेशों के अनुसार अनुसूचित जातियों, 
अनुसूचित जनजातियों, अन्य पिछड़े वर्गों, भूतपूर्व सैनिकों, और अन्य विशेष प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों के लिए उपबंध करना 
अपेक्षित है। 


अनुसूची 
पद का नाम पदों की संख्या वर्गीकरण वेतन मैट्रिक्स में | चयन अथवा सीधे भर्ती किए जाने वाले 
स्तर अचयन पद | व्यक्तियों के लिए आयु - 
सीमा 
(t) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) 
लेखापरीक्षक | 4696°(2022) साधारण केन्द्रीय | वेतन मैट्रिक्स अचयन 48 से 27 वर्ष के बीच। 
* कार्यभार के आधार | सेवा (समूह 'ग" | स्तर-5 . (रु. (केन्द्रीय सरकार द्वारा जारी 
पर परिवर्तन किया | अननुसचिवीय 29200-92300) निर्देशों या आदेशों के अनुसार 
जा सकता है। (अराजपत्रित) सरकारी कर्मचारियों को 
टिप्पण : सामान्य श्रेणी के लिए 40 वर्ष 
लेखापरीक्षक एवं तक तथा अनुसूचित जाति तथा 
ज्येष्ठ लेखापरीक्षक अनुसूचित जनजाति के लिए 
श्रेणी में पदों की 45 वर्ष तक की छूट)। आयु 
संयुक्त संख्याबल में से सीमा की प्रमाणिक तारीख का 
अधिकतम 80% ज्येष्ठ निर्धारण कर्मचारी चयन 
लेखापरीक्षक की श्रेणी आयोग द्वारा जारी किए गए 
में संचालित किया जा विज्ञापन के अनुसार होगा। 
सकता है। 
सीधे भर्ती किए | सीधे भर्ती परिवीक्षा | भर्ती की पद्धति : भर्ती सीधे । प्रोन्नति /प्रतिनियुक्ति / आमेलन द्वारा भर्ती की दशा में 
जाने वाले किए जाने वाले | की होगी या प्रोन्नति द्वारा या | उस श्रेणी का नाम जिससे प्रोन्नति / प्रतिनियुक्ति 
व्यक्तियों के व्यक्तियों के अवधि, | प्रतिनियुक्ति/ आमेलन द्वारा | /आमेलन किया जाएगा 
लिए अपेक्षित | लिए विहित | यदि कोई | तथा विभिन्न पद्धतियों 
शैक्षिक और आयु और हो द्वारा भरे जाने वाले पदों 
अन्य were | शैक्षिक की प्रतिशतता 
अहताएं प्रोन्नत 
व्यक्तियों की 
दशा में लागू 
होंगी या नहीं 
(7) (8) (9) (0) () 
किसी मान्यता | लागू नहीं सीधी । (i) 70 प्रतिशत सीधी भर्ती | (i) 20 प्रतिशत प्रोन्नति उन लिपिक-सह-टंककों में से 
प्राप्त होता भर्ती के | द्वारा जो उस श्रेणी में न्यूनतम 43 वर्ष की नियमित सेवा 
विश्वविद्यालय लिए दो | (ii) 20 प्रतिशत प्रोन्नति | पूरी कर चुके हैं। 
की डिग्री या वर्ष द्वारा (i) ॥0 प्रतिशत प्रोन्नति उन स्नातक लिपिकों-सह- 
समतुल्य अर्हता (iii) 0 प्रतिशत स्नातक टंककों और Aah बह कार्य कर्मचारीवृन्द में से जो 


26 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 [PART II—SEc. 4] 


लिपिक-सह-टंककों और 
स्नातक बहु कार्य 
कर्मचारीवृन्द में से उनके 
द्वारा विभागीय परीक्षा 
उत्तीर्ण करने पर। 

टिप्पण : लेखापरीक्षकों की 
सीधी भर्ती कर्मचारी चयन 
आयोग द्वारा आयोजित 
परीक्षा के आधार पर की 
जाएगी। 


लेखापरीक्षक पद के लिए विभागीय परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण 
करने के पश्चात्‌ न्यूनतम 3 वर्ष की सेवा पूरी कर चुके 
हैं। 

टिप्पणी : (4) स्नातक लिपिकों में से प्रोन्नति के लिए 
विभागीय परीक्षा तभी आयोजित की जाएगी जब 
पर्याप्त संख्या में रिक्तियां उपलब्ध होती है। बीच की 
अवधि के दौरान स्नातक लिपिक-सह-टंककों के लिए 
निर्धारित रिक्तियां न तो व्यपगत होंगी और न ही भरी 
जाएंगी। 

टिप्पणी : (2) लिपिक-सह-टंकक एवं आंकड़ा प्रविष्टि 
परिचालक, जो अधीनस्थ लेखा सेवा परीक्षा भाग-। 
उत्तीर्ण करते हैं, उन्हें उपरिलिखित 20 प्रतिशत are 
के प्रति बिना पारी के लेखापरीक्षक श्रेणी पर प्रोन्नत 
किया जाएगा। 

टिप्पणी : (3) 26 सितंबर 2009 को नियमित आधार 
पर लिपिक-सह-टंकक के पोषक पद धारण करने वाले 
व्यक्ति के लिए लेखापरीक्षक की श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के 
लिए पात्रता सेवा आठ वर्ष की बनी रहेगी। 


यदि विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति है तो उसकी संरचना भर्ती करने में किन परिस्थितियों में संघ 
लोक सेवा आयोग से परामर्श किया जाएगा 
(2) (3) 
समूह 'ग' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति निम्नलिखित से मिलकर बनेगी : लागू नहीं होगा। 


(4) रक्षा लेखा प्रधान नियंत्रक या रक्षा लेखा नियंत्रक या रक्षा लेखा अपर नियंत्रक या 


रक्षा लेखा संयुक्त नियंत्रक - अध्यक्ष 
(2) रक्षा लेखा उप नियंत्रक - सदस्य 
(3) रक्षा लेखा सहायक नियंत्रक या ज्येष्ठ लेखा अधिकारी - सदस्य 


[फा. सं. 9(3)/0/2047] 


वेदवीर आर्य, अपर वित्तीय सलाहकार और संयुक्त सचिव 


(Finance Division) 


NOTIFICATION 


New Delhi, the 30th May, 2023 


S.R.O. 74.—In exercise of the powers conferred by the proviso to Article 309 of the Constitution and in 
supersession of the Defence Accounts Department (Auditor) Recruitment Rules, 2009, except as respects things done 
or omitted to be done before such supersession, the President hereby makes the following rules regulating the method 
of recruitment to the post of Auditor in the Defence Accounts Department namely: - 


l. Short title and commencement: - (l) These rules may be called the Defence Accounts Department (Auditor) 


Recruitment Rules, 2022. 


(2) They shall come into force on the date of their publication in the Official Gazette. 


2. Number of posts, classification and level in pay matrix: -The number of the said posts, its classification and 
level in the pay matrix thereto, shall be as specified in column (2) to (4) of the Schedule annexed to these rules. 


3. Method of Recruitment, age- limit, qualification etc.: - The method of recruitment to the said post, age limit, 
qualifications and other matters connected therewith shall be as specified in column (5) to (l2) of the said 


Schedule. 


[भाग [---खण्ड 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 


4. Disqualifications: - No person, 


2I7 


(a) Who has entered into or contracted a marriage with a person having a spouse living; or 


(b) Who, having a spouse living, has entered into or contracted a marriage with any person shall be eligible 
for appointment to the said post: 


Provided that the Central Government may, if satisfied that such marriage is permissible under the personal 
law applicable to such person and the other party to the marriage and that there are other grounds for so doing, exempt 
any person from the operation of this rule. 


5. Power to relax: - Where the Central Government is of the opinion that it is necessary or expedient to do so, it 
may, by order, for reasons to be recorded in writing, relax any of the provisions of these rules with respect to any 
class or category of persons. 


6. Saving: - Nothing in these rules shall affect reservations, relaxation of age limit and other concessions required 
to be provided for the Schedules Castes, the Scheduled Tribes, the Ex-serviceman and any other special 
categories of persons in accordance with orders issued by the Government from time to time in this regard. 


SCHEDULE 
Name of | Number of Posts Classification Level in Pay Selection Age limit for direct 
Post Matrix post or non- recruits 
selection post 
() (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) 
Auditor 696*(2022) General Central | Level -5 in the pay | Non- Between |8 to 27 
Services (Group | matrix selection years. 
* Subject to | ‘C>) Ministerial (Rs 29200-92300) (Relaxable for 
variation dependent | (Non-Gazetted ) Government servants 
on workload. upto 40 years in the 
Note: Combined case of general 
strength of posts in candidates and 45 
the grades of years in the case of 
Auditor भाव Sr. Schedule Castes and 
Auditor, out of Schedule Tribes in 
which a maximum accordance with the 
of 80% may be instructions or orders 
operated in the grade issued by the Central 
of Sr. Auditor. Government). 
The crucial date for 
determining the age 
limit shall be 
advertised by the 
Staff Selection 
Commission. 
Educational Whether age | Period of | Method of recruitment | In case of recruitment by promotion 
and other and probation | whether by direct /deputation/absorption grade from 
Qualifications | educational | if any recruitment or by which 
required for | Qualifications promotion or by promotion/deputation/absorption to be 
direct recruits | prescribed deputation/absorption | made 
for direct and percentage of the 
recruits will posts to be filled by 
apply in case various methods 
of promotees. 
(7) (8) (9) (0) ce89) 
Degree of a Not Two years | (i) 70% by direct | 0) 20% by promotion from amongst 
recognised Applicable for direct | recruitment. Clerks-cum-Typists who have rendered a 
University or recruits. (ii) 20% by promotion. minimum of thirteen years regular service 
equivalent (iii) 0% by promotion | in the grade. 
qualification from amongst Graduate | (ii) 0% by promotion from amongst 


28 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 [PART II—SEc. 4] 


clerks-cum-Typists and 
Graduate Multi Tasking 
Staff on passing the 
departmental 
examination. 

Note: -Direct 
Recruitment of Auditors 
will be made on the basis 
of Examination 
conducted by Staff 
Selection Commission. 


Graduate Clerks-cum-Typists and 
Graduate Multi Tasking Staff having a 
minimum of three years of service on 
passing the Departmental Examination by 
them for the post of Auditor. 

Note: (.) The Departmental Examination 
for promotion out of graduate clerks shall 
be conducted as and when sufficient 
number of vacancies becomes available. 
During the intervening period, vacancies 
earmarked for graduate clerk-cum-Typist 
shall neither lapse nor be filled up. 

Note: (2) Clerks-cum-Typists and Data 
Entry Operators who pass _ Part-I 
Subordinate Accounts Service 
Examination shall be promoted out of 
turn to the grade of Auditor, against the 
aforesaid 20% quota. 

Note: (3) The eligibility service for 
promotion to the grade of Auditor shall 
continue to be eight years for person 
holding the feeder post of Clerk-cum- 
Typist on regular basis as on the 26" 
September 2009. 


If Departmental promotion Committee exists what is its composition 


Circumstances in which 
Union Public Service 
Commission is to be 
consulted in making 


recruitment 
(2) (3) 
Group (7 Departmental Promotion Committee consisting of; Not Applicable 


(.) Principal Controller of Defence Accounts or Controller of Defence 


(2) Deputy Controllers of Defence Accounts 


(3) Assistant Controllers of Defence Accounts or Senior Accounts Officer 


Accounts or Additional Controller of Defence Accounts or Joint 
Controller of Defence Accounts 


- Chairman 
- Member 
- Member 


[F. No. 9(3)/C/207] 


VEDVEER ARYA, Addl. Financial Adviser and Jt. Secy. 


अधिसूचना 
नई दिल्‍ली, 5 जून, 2023 


(रक्षा अनुसंधान और विकास विभाग) 


का.नि.आ. 75.--राष्ट्रपति, संविधान के अनुच्छेद 309 के परंतुक द्वारा प्रदत्त शक्तियों का प्रयोग करते हुए और 


रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन, रक्षा मंत्रालय (सिविल संनिर्माण काडर) भर्ती नियम, 2000 एवं रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा 
विकास संगठन, रक्षा मंत्रालय, अपर मुख्य निर्माण अभियंता (सिविल संनिर्माण अधिकारी काडर) भर्ती नियम 2044 को, 
उन बातों के सिवाय अधिक्रांत करते हुए जिन्हें ऐसे अधिक्रमण से पूर्व किया गया है यह करने से लोप किया गया है रक्षा 


[भाग II—avs 4] भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 29 


मंत्रालय, रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन में निर्माण स्थापना में मुख्य कार्यकारी (सिविल संनिर्माण एवं संपदा), मुख्य 
निर्माण अभियंता-सह-सहायक निदेशक (संनिर्माण), अपर मुख्य निर्माण अभियंता, उप मुख्य निर्माण अभियंता-सह- 
परियोजना प्रबंधक, निर्माण अभियंता-सह-उप परियोजना प्रबंधक, उप निर्माण अभियंता-सह-सहायक परियोजना प्रबंधक 
एवं सहायक निर्माण अभियंता के पद पर भर्ती की पद्धति का विनियमन करने के लिए निम्नलिखित नियम बनाते हैं, 
अर्थात्‌:- 
. संक्षिप्त नाम और प्रारम्भ - (() इन नियमों का संक्षित नाम रक्षा मंत्रालय, रक्षा अनुसंधान और विकास संगठन, 
सिविल निर्माण अधिकारी कैडर (समूह “क' तथा ‘|’ पद) भर्ती नियम, 2023 है। 
(2) ये सरकारी राजपत्र में उनके प्रकाशन की तारीख को प्रवृत्त होंगे। 
2. आवेदन - ये नियम इन पदों पर लागू होंगे जो इन नियमों में उपाबद्ध अनुसूची के स्तंभ (॥) मे विनिर्दिष्ट है। 
3. पदों की संख्या, वर्गीकरण, वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर - उक्त पदों की संख्या, उनका वर्गीकरण और वेतन मैट्रिक्स में 
स्तर वे होंगे, जो उक्त अनुसूची के स्तम्भ (2) से स्तंभ (4) तक में विनिर्दिष्ट होंगे। 
4. भर्ती की पद्धति, आयु-सीमा और अहताएं आदि - उक्त पदों पर भर्ती की पद्धति, आयु-सीमा, अर्हताएं और उनसे 
संबंधित अन्य बातें वे होंगी जो उक्त अनुसूची के स्तंभ (5) से स्तंभ (43) में विनिर्दिष्ट होंगे। 
5. निरहता - वह व्यक्ति,- 
(क) जिसने ऐसे व्यक्ति से जिसका पति या जिसकी पत्नी जीवित है, विवाह किया है या विवाह की संविदा की है; 
या 
(ख) जिसने अपने पति या अपनी पत्नी के जीवित रहते हुए किसी व्यक्ति से विवाह या विवाह की संविदा की हो, 


परन्तु यदि केन्द्रीय सरकार का यह समाधान हो जाता है कि ऐसा विवाह ऐसे व्यक्ति और विवाह के अन्य पक्षकार 
को लागू cate विधि के अधीन अनुज्ञेय है और ऐसा करने के लिए अन्य आधार हैं तो वह किसी व्यक्ति को इस नियम के 
प्रवर्तन से छूट दे सकेगी। 


6. शिथिल करने की शक्ति - जहां केन्द्रीय सरकार की यह राय है कि ऐसा करना आवश्यक या समीचीन है, वहां वह 
उसके लिए जो कारण हैं, उन्हें लेखबद्ध करके तथा संघ लोक सेवा आयोग से परामर्श करके, इन नियमों के किसी उपबंध 
को किसी वर्ग या प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों की बाबत, आदेश द्वारा शिथिल कर सकेगी। 


7. व्यावृत्ति - इन नियमों की कोई बात, ऐसे आरक्षण, आयु-सीमा में छूट और अन्य रियायतों पर प्रभाव नहीं 
डालेगी, जिनका केन्द्रीय सरकार द्वारा इस संबंध में समय-समय पर जारी किए गए आदेशों के अनुसार अनुसूचित जातियों, 
अनुसूचित जनजातियों, अन्य पिछड़े वर्गों, भूतपूर्व कार्मिकों और अन्य विशेष प्रवर्ग के व्यक्तियों के लिए उपबंध करना 
अपेक्षित है। 


अनुसूची 
पद का नाम =| पदों की संख्या | वर्गीकरण वेतन मैट्रिक्स में | चयन या अचयन | सीधे भर्ती किए | सीधे भर्ती किए 
स्तर पद जाने वाले जाने वाले व्यक्तियों 
व्यक्तियों के लिए | के लिए अपेक्षित 
आयु सीमा शैक्षिक और अन्य 
eae 
(4) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7) 
4. मुख्य ‘has साधारण वेतन मैट्रिक्स में | चयन लागू नहीं होता । लागू नहीं होता 
कार्यपालक | (2023) केन्द्रीय सेवा, | स्‍तर - 44 
(सिविल *कार्यभार के (समूह 'क', (44200- 
निर्माण तथा | आधार पर राजपत्रित) 248200 रू.) 
संपदा) परिवर्तन किया | (तकनीकी) 
जा सकता 
है। 


220 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 


[PART II—SEC. 4] 


सीधी भर्ती किए | परिवीक्षा की | भर्ती की पद्धति, भर्ती । पदोन्नति या प्रतिनियुक्ति या आमेलन द्वारा भर्ती की दशा में, वह 

जाने वाले अवधि, यदि सीधी होगी या प्रोन्नति | श्रेणियां जिनसे प्रोन्नति या प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन किया जाए। 

व्यक्तियों के लिए | कोई हो। द्वारा या प्रतिनियुक्ति या 

विहित आयु तथा आमेलन द्वारा तथा 

शैक्षणिक अर्घताएं विभिन्न पद्धतियों द्वारा 

प्रोन्नत व्यक्तियों भरी जाने वाली 

की दशा में लागू रिक्तियों की प्रतिशतता। 

होंगी या नहीं 

(8) (9) (0) (4) 

लागू नहीं होता। | लागू नहीं | प्रोन्नति द्वारा जिसके न | प्रोन्नतिः वेतन मैट्रिक्स स्तर-43क A (73400-246600 रू.) ऐसे 

होता। हो सकने पर | मुख्य निर्माण इंजीनियर-सह-निदेशक (निर्माण कार्य) जिसने उस 


प्रतिनियुक्ति द्वारा। 


श्रेणी में दो वर्ष की नियमित सेवा की हो। 

टिप्पण : जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में जिन्होंने अपनी 
Hen या पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर ली हो, प्रोन्नति के लिए विचार 
किया जा रहा हो, वहां उनसे ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में भी विचार 
किया जाएगा परन्तु यह तब जबकि उनके द्वारा की गई ऐसी eH 
या पात्रता सेवा, अपेक्षित अर्हक या पात्रता सेवा के आधे से अधिक 
या दो वर्ष, इनमें से जो भी कम हो और उन्होंने अपने ऐसे कनिष्ठ 
व्यक्तियों सहित, जिन्होंने ऐसी अर्हक या पात्रता सेवा पहले ही पूरी 
कर ली है, अगली उच्चतर श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के लिए अपनी परिवीक्षा 
की अवधि सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली हो। 


प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन: केन्द्रीय सरकार की संगठित इंजीनियरी सेवा 
के या अन्य विभागों या राज्य सरकारों या पब्लिक सेक्टर के 
उपक्रमों के अधीन ऐसे सिविलियन अधिकारी,- 


(i) जो मूल काडर या विभाग में नियमित आधार पर सदृश पद 
धारण किए हुए हैं; या 

(ii) वेतन मैट्रिक्स TAT- 3% (300-26600 रू.) में नियमित 
आधार पर इस पद पर दो वर्ष नियमित सेवा की हो | 


टिप्पण 4: पोषक प्रवर्ग के ऐसे विभागीय अधिकारी जो प्रोन्नति 
की सीधी पंक्ति में हैं, प्रतिनियुक्ति पर नियुक्ति के लिए विचार किए 
जाने के पात्र नहीं होंगे। इसी प्रकार, प्रतिनियुक्त व्यक्ति प्रोन्नति 
द्वारा नियुक्ति के लिए विचार किए जाने के पात्र नहीं होंगे। 

टिप्पण 2: प्रतिनियुक्ति की अवधि जिसके अंतर्गत केन्द्रीय सरकार 
के उसी या किसी अन्य संगठन या विभाग में इस नियुक्ति से ठीक 
पहले धारित किसी अन्य संवर्ग बाह्य पद पर प्रतिनियुक्ति की 
अवधि है, साधारणतया तीन वर्ष से अधिक नहीं होगी। 

टिप्पण 3: प्रतिनियुक्ति द्वारा नियुक्ति के लिए अधिकतम आयु 
सीमा आवेदन प्राप्त करने की अंतिम तारीख को 56 वर्ष से अधिक 
नहीं होगी। 


[भाग ]---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 22 
यदि कोई विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति है तो उसकी संरचना क्‍या है। परिस्थितियां जिनमें भर्ती करने के लिए 
संघ लोक सेवा आयोग से परामर्श किया 
जाएगा। 
(2) (73) 
| समूह “क' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति (प्रोन्नति पर विचार करने के लिए) जिसमें लागू नहीं होता। 
सम्मिलित होंगे - 
4. अध्यक्ष, भर्ती तथा मूल्यांकन Hes, रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन-अध्यक्ष; 
2. अध्यक्ष, रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन-सदस्य; 
3. दो महानिदेशक, रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन -सदस्य; 
(4) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7) 
2. मुख्य 6* साधारण [| वेतन मैट्रिक्स में | चयन 50 वर्ष से अधिक आवश्यक: 
निर्माण (2023) केन्द्रीय सेवा| स्तर-43क नहीं (केन्द्रीय सरकार | (i) किसी मान्यता प्राप्त 
अभियंता- *कार्य भार | समूह 'क' | (43400- द्वारा समय-समय पर | विश्वविद्यालय/संस्थान से 
सह-निदेशक | के आधार राजपत्रित | 246600 रु.) जारी किए गए सिविल/विद्युत/यांत्रिक 
(निर्माण) पर (तकनीकी) अनुदेशों या आदेशों के | इंजीनियरी या स्थापत्य 
परिवर्तन अनुसार सरकारी कला में स्नातक डिग्री या 
किया जा सेवकों के लिए समतुल्य; 
सकता है। शिथिल करके पांच (ii) 
वर्ष तक की जा कार्यशालाओं/कारखानों/ 
सकती है।) अनुसंधान स्थापनों की 
टिप्पण: आयु-सीमा | मुख्य समयबद्ध 
अवधारित करने के परियोजनाओं की योजना 
लिए निर्णायक बनाने या उसके निष्पादन 
तारीख अभ्यर्थियों से । में बारह वर्ष का अनुभव; 
आवेदन प्राप्त करने के | (# संपदा प्रबंधन का 
लिए नियत की गई अनुभव (अर्थात्‌ 
अंतिम तारीख होगी, | अतिक्रमण, विकास 
न कि वह अंतिम भोगाधिकारों, 
तारीख जो असम, मुकदमेबाजी तथा इनसे 
मेघालय, अरूणाचल | संबंधित अन्य मामले) 
प्रदेश मिजोरम, वहां बसे लोगों के लिए 
मणिपुर, नागालैंड नागरिक सुविधाओं की 
त्रिपुरा, सिक्षिम और | व्यवस्था करने, संपदा, 
लाहोल तथा स्पीति | वृक्षसंवर्धन एवं 
जिले, हिमाचल पर्यावरणीय स्वास्थ्य, 
प्रदेश के चम्बा जिले | नागरिक करों और इनसे 
के पांगी उपखंड, संबंधित अन्य मामलों 
लद्दाख, अंडमान और | तथा भूमि अधिग्रहण, 
निकोबार द्वीप और विधियों, भूमि मूल्य 
लक्षद्वीप के संघ राज्य | निर्धारण तकनीकों, 
क्षेत्र के अभ्यर्थियों के | बातचीत द्वारा तय क्रय 
लिए विहित की गई अथवा अचल संपत्ति को 
है।) किराए पर लेने से 
संबंधित नियमों की 
विशेषज्ञ के रूप में 
जानकारी। 


222 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 


[PART II—SEC. 4] 


(8) 


(9) 


(70) 


(7) 


लागू नहीं होता। 


सीधी भर्ती के लिए 
एक वर्ष 

टिप्पण : केन्द्रीय 
सरकार द्वारा 
निर्धारित परिवीक्षा 
की अवधि 
सफलतापूर्वक पूरा 
करने के लिए दो 
सप्ताह का अनिवार्य 
समावेशन प्रशिक्षण 
दिया जाएगा। 


(ii) ७ प्रोन्नति 
द्वारा जिसके न 
हो सकने पर 
प्रतिनियुक्ति या 
आमेलन द्वारा, 
जिसके न हो 
सकने पर भूतपूर्व 
अधिकारियों के 
पुनर्नियोजन द्वारा 
और दोनों के न 
हो सकने पर 
सीधी भर्ती द्वारा 
। 


orate: वेतन मैट्रिक्स taz-43 में ((23400-245900 रू.) ऐसे 
अपर मुख्य संनिर्माण इंजीनियर जिसने ग्रेड में दो वर्ष की नियमित 
सेवा की हो। 

टिप्पण: जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में जिन्होंने अपनी अर्ईक 
या पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर ली हो, प्रोन्नति के लिए विचार किया जा 
रहा हो, वहां उनसे ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में भी विचार किया 
जाएगा परन्तु यह तब जबकि उनके द्वारा की गई ऐसी eH या 
पात्रता सेवा, अपेक्षित ASH या पात्रता सेवा के आधे से अधिक या 
दो वर्ष, इनमें से जो भी कम हो, कम न हो और उन्होंने अपने ऐसे 
कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों सहित, जिन्होंने ऐसी अर्ईक या पात्रता सेवा पहले 
ही पूरी कर ली है, अगली उच्चतर श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के लिए अपनी 
परिवीक्षा की अवधि सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली हो। 
प्रतिनियुक्तिआमेलन(सिविलियन अधिकारी) : केन्द्रीय सरकार की 
संगठित इंजीनियरी सेवा के या अन्य विभागों या राज्य सरकारों या 
पब्लिक सेक्टर के उपक्रमों के अधीन ऐसे सिविलियन अधिकारी,- 
(क) (i) जो मूल काडर या विभाग में नियमित आधार पर सदृश पद 

धारण किए हुए हैं; या 

(ii) वेतन मैट्रिक्स Fax-i3 (423400-245900 रू.) में 
नियमित आधार पर इस पद पर दो वर्ष नियमित सेवा की हो। 

(ख) जिनके पास स्तंभ (7) के अधीन सीधी भर्ती किए जाने वाले 
व्यक्तियों के लिए विहित शैक्षिक अर्हताएं और अनुभव रखता हो। 
प्रतिनियुक्ति / आमेलन या पुनर्नियोजन (सेवा अधिकारी),- 

(i) tert में कर्नल रेंक () की सेवा वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्तर-43 
(425700-244000) या समतुल्य में ऐसे इंजीनियर अधिकारी 
जिनके पास उस रैंक में कार्यशालाओं/का रखानों/अनुसंधान स्थापनों 
की मुख्य समयबद्ध परियोजनाओं के सिविल निर्माण की योजना 
बनाने या उसके निष्पादन का पांच वर्ष का अनुभव है या ऐसे 
लैफ्टिनेंट कर्नल/समतुल्य जिन्होंने उस रेंक में सात वर्ष की नियमित 
सेवा की है; और 

(ii) जिनके पास सीधी भर्ती के लिए विहित अनुभव और शैक्षिक 
Hears हैं। ऐसे अधिकारियों के संबंध में भी विचार किया जाएगा 
जो एक वर्ष की अवधि में रिजर्व में स्थानांतरित किए जाने वाले हैं 
और जिनके पास अपेक्षित अनुभव और अहतता हैं। यदि ऐसे व्यक्तियों 
का चयन किया जाता है तो उन्हें उस तारीख तक प्रतिनियुक्ति के 
निबंधनों पर रखा जाएगा जिसमें उन्हें सशस्त्र बल से निर्मुक्त किया 
जाना है, तत्पश्चात उन्हें पुनर्नियोजन के निबंधनों पर बने रहने दिया 
जा सकता Sl ऐसे अधिकारियों के पद पर उनके वास्तविक चयन से 
पूर्व सेवानिवृत्त होने या रिजर्व में स्थानांतरित किए जाने की दशा में 
उनकी नियुक्ति पुनर्नियोजन के आधार पर होगी। (सिविल पदों के 
प्रतिनिर्देश से अधिवार्षिता की आयु तक पुनर्नियोजन) 

टिप्पण 4: पोषक प्रवर्ग के ऐसे विभागीय अधिकारी जो प्रोन्नति की 
सीधी पंक्ति में हैं, प्रतिनियुक्ति पर नियुक्ति के लिए विचार किए 
जाने के पात्र नहीं होंगे। इसी प्रकार, प्रतिनियुक्त व्यक्ति प्रोन्नति द्वारा 
नियुक्ति के लिए विचार किए जाने के पात्र नहीं होंगे। 

टिप्पण 2: प्रतिनियुक्ति की अवधि (जिसके अंतर्गत अल्पकालिक 
संविदा भी है) जिसके अंतर्गत केन्द्रीय सरकार के उसी या किसी 


[भाग त---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 


223 


नहीं होगी। 


अन्य संगठन या विभाग में इस नियुक्ति से ठीक पहले धारित किसी 
अन्य संवर्ग बाह्य पद पर प्रतिनियुक्ति की अवधि (जिसके अंतर्गत 
अल्पकालिक संविदा भी है) है, साधारणतया तीन वर्ष से अधिक 


टिप्पण 3: प्रतिनियुक्ति द्वारा नियुक्ति के लिए अधिकतम आयु सीमा 
आवेदन प्राप्त करने की अंतिम तारीख को 56 वर्ष से अधिक नहीं 


होगी। 
(2) (3) 
समूह 'क' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति (प्रोन्नति पर विचार करने के लिए) जिसमें निम्नलिखित सम्मिलित | लागू नहीं होता। 
होंगे:- 
q. अध्यक्ष, भर्ती तथा मूल्यांकन केन्द्र, रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन -अध्यक्ष; 
2. महानिदेशक, रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन या वैज्ञानिक 'एच' -सदस्य; 
3. मुख्य कार्यकारी (सिविल निर्माण तथा संपदा), अनुसंधान तथा विकास - सदस्य 
4. कार्मिक निदेशालय, अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन - सदस्य। 
समूह 'क' विभागीय पुष्टिकरण समिति (पुष्टि पर विचार करने के लिए) जिसमें निम्नलिखित सम्मिलित 
होंगे। 
T. अध्यक्ष, भर्ती तथा मूल्यांकन केन्द्र, रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन -अध्यक्ष; 
2. महानिदेशक, रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन या वैज्ञानिक 'एच' -सदस्य; 
3. मुख्य कार्यकारी (सिविल निर्माण तथा संपदा), अनुसंधान तथा विकास - सदस्य; 
4. कार्मिक निदेशालय, अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन - सदस्य। 
(4) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7) 
3. अपर | 0* साधारण | वेतन मैट्रिक्स | चयन। 50 वर्ष से अधिक नहीं | (क) आवश्यकः 
मुख्य (2023) | केन्द्रीय सेवा, में rqz-3 (केन्द्रीय. सरकार द्वारा | (i) किसी मान्यता प्राप्त 
संनिर्माण | “कार्य समूह क' | (23400- समय-समय पर जारी किए | विश्वविद्यालय/संस्थान से 
इंजीनियर | भार के | राजपत्रित | 275900 रु.) गए अनुदेशों या आदेशों के | सिविल/विद्युत/यांत्रिक 
आधार | (तकनीकी) अनुसार सरकारी सेवकों के | इंजीनियरी या स्थापत्य कला 
पर लिए पांच वर्ष तक शिथिल | में स्नातक डिग्री या समतुल्य; 
परिवर्तन की जा सकती है।) (ii) सरकारी सेवा या अर्द्ध- 
किया जा टिप्पणः आयु-सीमा सरकारी या स्थानीय निकाय 
सकता है। अवधारित करने के लिए | में जिम्मेदारी वाले पद पर 
निर्णायक तारीख रहते हुए सिविल संनिर्माण की 
अभ्यर्थियों से आवेदन प्राप्त | योजना बनाने या उसके 
करने के लिए नियत की निष्पादन में दस वर्ष का 
गई अंतिम तारीख होगी, | अनुभव। 
न कि वह अंतिम तारीख. | (iii) सरकारी सेवा या अर्द्ध- 
जो असम, मेघालय, सरकारी या स्थानीय निकाय 
अरूणाचल प्रदेश में जिम्मेदारी वाले पद पर 
मिजोरम, मणिपुर, रहते हुए कार्यशालाओं/ 
नागालैंड त्रिपुरा, सिक्षिम | कारखानों/ अनुसंधान 
और लाहोल तथा स्पीति | स्थापनों की मुख्य समयबद्ध 
जिले, हिमाचल प्रदेश के | परियोजनाओं की योजना 
चम्बा जिले के पांगी बनाने या उसके निष्पादन का 
उपखंड, लद्दाख, अंडमान | अनुभव; अथवा 


224 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 


[PART II—SEC. 4] 


और निकोबार द्वीप और 
लक्षद्वीप के संघ राज्यक्षेत्र 
के अभ्यर्थियों के लिए 
विहित की गई है। 


(iv) सरकारी सेवा या स्थानीय 
निकाय में जिम्मेदारी वाले पद 
पर रहते हुए संपदा प्रबंधन का 
अनुभव (अर्थात अतिक्रमण, 
विकास भोगाधिकारों एवं 
मुकदमेबाजी तथा इनसे 
संबंधित अन्य मामले) वहां बसे 
लोगों के लिए नागरिक 
सुविधाओं की व्यवस्था करने, 
संपदा, वृक्षसंवर्धन एवं 
पर्यावरणीय स्वास्थ्य, नागरिक 
करों और इनसे संबंधित अन्य 
मामलों तथा भूमि अधिग्रहण, 
विधियों, भूमि मूल्य निर्धारण 
तकनीकों, बातचीत द्वारा तय 


क्रय अथवा अचल संपत्ति को 
किराए पर लेने से संबंधित 
नियमों की विशेषज्ञ के रूप में 
जानकारी। 
(ख) वांछनीयः 
आवास के पैमानों, बजट 
मानीटर करने तथा परिमाण 
सर्वेक्षण की जानकारी। 
(8) (9) (0) (4) 
लागू नहीं | सीधी भर्ती के (i) 75% प्रोन्नतिः वेतन मैट्रिक्स स्तर -42 F (78800-209200 रू.) ऐसे उप मुख्य 
होता। लिए एक वर्ष प्रोन्नति द्वारा जिसके | संनिर्माण इंजीनियर-सह-परियोजना प्रबंधक जिसने ग्रेड में पांच वर्ष की 
टिप्पण: केन्द्रीय न हो सकने पर नियमित सेवा की हो। 
सरकार द्वारा प्रतिनियुक्ति या टिप्पण: जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में जिन्होंने अपनी अर्हक या 
निर्धारित आमेलन द्वारा और | पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर ली हो, प्रोन्नति के लिए विचार किया जा रहा हो, 
परिवीक्षा की दोनों के न हो सकने | वहां उनसे ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में भी विचार किया जाएगा परन्तु यह 
अवधि पर सीधी भर्ती तब जबकि उनके द्वारा की गई ऐसी अर्हक या पात्रता सेवा, अपेक्षित अर्हक 
सफलतापूर्वक पूरा | द्वारा। या पात्रता सेवा के आधे से अधिक या दो वर्ष, इनमें से जो भी कम हो, 
करने के लिएदो | (ii) 25% कम न हो और उन्होंने अपने ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों सहित, जिन्होंने ऐसी 
सप्ताह का प्रतिनियुक्ति/ Heh या पात्रता सेवा पहले ही पूरी कर ली है, अगली उच्चतर श्रेणी में 
अनिवार्य प्रवेश आमेलन द्वारा, प्रोन्नति के लिए अपनी परिवीक्षा की अवधि सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली 
प्रशिक्षण दिया जिसके न हो सकने | हो। 
जाएगा। पर भूतपूर्व सेना प्रतिनियुक्तिआमेलन (सिविलियन अधिकारी) : केन्द्रीय सरकार की 
अधिकारियों के संगठित इंजीनियरी सेवा के या अन्य विभागों या राज्य सरकारों या 
पुनर्नियोजन द्वारा पब्लिक सेक्टर के उपक्रमों के अधीन ऐसे सिविलियन अधिकारी,- 
और दोनों के न हो. (क) (i) जो मूल काडर या विभाग में नियमित आधार पर सदृश पद धारण 
सकने पर सीधी भर्ती किए हुए हैं; या 
द्वारा। () जिन्होंने मूल काडर/विभाग में वेतन मैट्रिक्स स्तर-42 (78800- 


209200 रू.) में नियमित आधार पर इस पद पर नियुक्ति के पश्चात 
उस श्रेणी में पांच वर्ष नियमित सेवा की हो; और 


[भाग तए---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 


225 


244000) में या समतुल्य; अथवा 


की हो; और 


शैक्षिक अर्हता रखता ST 


तीन वर्ष से अधिक नहीं होगी। 


(ख) स्तंभ (7) के अधीन सीधी भर्ती किए जाने वाले व्यक्तियों के लिए 
विहित शैक्षिक अर्हताएं और अनुभव रखता ST 

प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन या पुनर्नियोजन (सेवा अधिकारी),- 

निम्नलिखित रैंक की सेना के ऐसे इंजीनियर अधिकारी जो,- 

(i) रक्षा में ऐसे कर्नल जिनका वेतन मैट्रिक्स वेतन स्तर-43 (425700- 


(ii) tat में ऐसे लैफ्टिनेंट कर्नल जिनका वेतन मैट्रिक्स वेतन स्तर-42क 
(46700-20700) में या anaes रैंक में पांच वर्ष की नियमित सेवा 


(iii) जो सीधी भर्ती के लिए स्तंभ (7) के अधीन विहित अनुभव और 


टिप्पण 4: ऐसे अधिकारियों के संबंध में विचार किया जाएगा, जो एक 
वर्ष की अवधि के भीतर सेवानिवृत्त होने वाले हैं या रिजर्व! में 
स्थानांतरित किए जाने वाले हैं और जिनके पास अपेक्षित अनुभव और 
Hears Sl ऐसे व्यक्तियों को उस तारीख तक प्रतिनियुक्त के निबंधनों पर 
रखा जाएगा जिस तारीख से उन्हें सशस्त्र बल से निर्मुक्त किया जाना है, 
तत्पश्चात्‌ उन्हें पुर्नियोजन पर बने रहने दिया जा सकता है। 

टिप्पण 2: पोषक प्रवर्ग के ऐसे विभागीय अधिकारी, जो प्रोन्नति की सीधी 
पंक्ति में है, प्रतिनियुक्ति पर नियुक्ति के लिए विचार किए जाने के पात्र 
नहीं होंगे। इसी प्रकार प्रतिनियुक्त व्यक्ति प्रोन्नति द्वारा नियुक्ति के लिए 
विचार किए जाने के पात्र नहीं होंगे। 

टिप्पण 3: प्रतिनियुक्ति की अवधि जिसके अंतर्गत केन्द्रीय सरकार के उसी 
या किसी अन्य संगठन या विभाग में इस नियुक्ति से ठीक पहले धारित 
किसी अन्य बाह्य संवर्ग पद पर प्रतिनियुक्ति की अवधि है साधारणतया 


टिप्पण 4: प्रतिनियुक्ति द्वारा नियुक्ति के लिए अधिकतम आयु सीमा 
आवेदन प्राप्त करने की अंतिम तारीख को 56 वर्ष से अधिक नहीं होगी। 


(72) 


(73) 


समूह 'क' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति (प्रोन्नति पर विचार करने के लिए) जिसमें निम्नलिखित 
सम्मिलित होंगे:- 


4. अध्यक्ष, भर्ती तथा मूल्यांकन केन्द्र, रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन -अध्यक्ष; 
2. महानिदेशक, रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन या वैज्ञानिक 'एच' -सदस्य; 

3. मुख्य कार्यपालक (सिविल निर्माण तथा संपदा) - सदस्य; 
4. कार्मिक निदेशालय, रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन - सदस्य। 


समूह ‘we विभागीय पुष्टिकरण समिति (पुष्टि पर विचार करने के लिए) जिसमें निम्नलिखित 
सम्मिलित होंगे। 


4. अध्यक्ष, भर्ती तथा मूल्यांकन केन्द्र, रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन -अध्यक्ष; 
2. महानिदेशक, रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन या वैज्ञानिक 'एच' -सदस्य; 
3. मुख्य कार्यपालक (सिविल निर्माण तथा संपदा), अनुसंधान तथा विकास - सदस्य; 


4. निदेशक, कार्मिक रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन - सदस्य; 


लागू नहीं होता। 


226 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 [PART II—SEC. 4] 
() (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7) 
4. उप 6* साधारण | RqR-2 चयन [| 45 वर्ष से अधिक नहीं | (क) आवश्यक: 
सा (2023) केन्द्रीय वेतन (केन्द्रीय सरकार द्वारा (i) मान्यताप्राप्र विश्वविद्यालय 
संनिर्माण Giga eer सेवा, मैट्रिक्स में समय-समय . जारी | अथवा शिक्षण संस्थाओं से सिविल 
इंजीनियर अनुसार समूह 'क' | स्तर किए गण ATM अथवा | अथवा विद्युत अथवा यांत्रिकी 
सह परिवर्तन राजपत्रित | (78800- आदेशों के अनुसार | अथवा वास्तुकला इंजीनियरी में 
परियोजना किया जा (तकनीकी) | 209200 सरकारी सेवकों के लिए | डिग्री अथवा समतुल्य। 
प्रबंधक ney रु.) पांच वर्ष तक शिथिल की 
सकता है। watt | 
जा सक 
टिप्पणी: — (ii) सिविल संनिर्माण के नियोजन 
मी | अथवा निष्पादन में आठ वर्ष का 


अवधारित करने के लिए 
निर्णायक तारीख 
अभ्यार्थियों से आवेदन 
प्राप्त करने के लिए नियत 
की गई अंतिम तारीख 
होगी (न कि वह अंतिम 
तारीख जो असम, 
मेघालय, अरुणाचल 
प्रदेश, मिजोरम, मणिपुर, 
नागालैंड, त्रिपुरा, 
सिक्किम, लाहोल एवं 
स्पति जिला एवं 
हिमाचल प्रदेश के चम्बा 
जिला तथा ere, 
अंडमान एवं निकोबार 
द्वीपों एवं लक्ष्यद्वीपों के 
संघ राज्य क्षेत्रों के 
अभ्यर्थियों के लिए 
निर्धारित अंतिम तारीख 
नहीं होगी। 


अनुभव, और। 


(iii) कार्यशाला अथवा कारखाना 
अथवा अनुसंधान carat की 
मुख्य समयबद्ध परियोजनाओं के 
नियोजन अथवा निष्पादन का 
अनुभव; या 

(५) सरकारी सेवा अथवा 
अर्द्धसरकारी या स्थानीय निकाय 
में जिम्मेदारी वाले पद पर रहते 
हुए संपदा प्रबंधत का अनुभव 
(अर्थात अतिक्रमण, विकास 
भोगाधिकारों एवं मुकदमेबाजी 
तथा इनसे संबंधित अन्य मामले) 
वहां बसे लोगों के लिए नागरिक 
सुविधाओं की व्यवस्था करने, 
संपदा, वृक्षसंवर्धन एवं 
पर्यावरणीय स्वास्थ, नागरिक करों 
और इनसे संबंधित अन्य मामलों 
तथा भूमि अधिग्रहण विधियों, 
भूमि मूल्य निर्धारण तकनीकों, 
बातचीत द्वारा तय क्रय अथवा 
अचल संपत्ति को किराए पर लेने 
से संबंधित नियमों की विशेषज्ञ के 
रूप में जानकारी। 

(ख) वांछनीयः 

() सर्वेक्षण संस्थान से भवन 
निर्माण तथा परिमाण सर्वेक्षण में 
डिग्री 

(ii) बजट नियंत्रण की जानकारी 
एवं सिविल निर्माण की निगरानी। 
(iii) सिविल निर्माण का गठन एवं 
नियोजन में अनुभव। 


[भाग त---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 227 
(8) (9) (0) (7) 
जागू नहीं होता। | सीधी भर्ती के लिए | () पचहत्तर प्रतिशत orate: वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्‍तर (/ (67700-208700 रु.) में 
एक वर्ष। टिप्पणी: प्रोन्नति द्वारा जिसके न हो | ऐसा संनिर्माण इंजीनियर-सह-परियोजना प्रबंधक जिसने 
केन्द्रीय सरकार के | सकने पर प्रतिनियुक्ति/ | नियमित आधार पर उस श्रेणी में पांच वर्ष के लिए सेवा की हो 
निर्देशानुसार आमेलन द्वारा, दोनों के न | टिप्पण: जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में जिन्होंने अपनी 
परिवीक्षा की सफल | हो सकने पर सीधी भर्ती Heh या पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर ली हो, प्रोन्नति के लिए विचार 
समाप्ति के लिए कम | द्वारा; किया जा रहा हो, वहां उनसे ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में भी 
से कम दो सप्ताह का (0) पच्चीस प्रतिशत विचार किया जाएगा, परन्तु यह तब जबकि उनके द्वारा की गई 
एक अनिवार्य प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन ऐसी sen या पात्रता सेवा, अपेक्षित aH या पात्रता सेवा के 
समावेशन प्रशिक्षण | द्वारा जिसके न हो सकने | आधे से अधिक से या दो वर्ष से इनमें से जो भी कम हो, कम न हो 
होगा। पर भूतपूर्व सेना और उन्होंने अपने ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों सहित, जिन्होंने ऐसी 
अधिकारियों के Heh या पात्रता सेवा पहले ही पूरी कर ली है, अगली उच्चतर 
पुनर्नियोजन द्वारा और श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के लिए अपनी परिवीक्षा की अवधि 
दोनों के न हो सकने पर | सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली हो। 
सीधी भर्ती द्वारा। 


प्रतिनियुक्तिआमेलन (सिविलियन अधिकारी): केन्द्रीय सरकार 
या अन्य विभागों राज्य सरकार या सार्वजनिक उपक्रमों के ऐसे 
सिविलियन अधिकारी,- 


(क) (i) जो नियमित आधार पर मूल काडर या विभाग में ager 
पद धारण किए हुए हैं। 

(ii) जिन्होंने वेतन Alert (67700-208700/-) में Faz-77 

में नियमित आधार पर उस श्रेणी में पांच वर्ष सेवा की हो। 

(ख) स्तंभ (7) के अधीन सीधी भर्ती के लिए शैक्षिण अर्हता और 
अनुभव रखता हो। 
प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन या पुनर्नियोजन (सेना अधिकारी): केन्द्रीय 
सरकार या अन्य विभागों राज्य सरकार या सार्वजनिक उपक्रमों 
के ऐसे सिविलियन अधिकारी जो,- 
(i) tat वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्‍तर 72% (46700-20700 रु.) में 
लेफ्टिनेंट कर्नल वेतन स्तर या समतुल्य। 
(ii) tat में वेतन मैट्रिक्स eaz- में (69400-436900 =.) 
मेजर या समतुल्य जिसने इस रैंक में पांच वर्ष की नियमित सेवा 
की हो। 
(iii) Fast (7) के अधीन सीधी भर्ती के लिए विहित शैक्षिक agar 
और अनुभव रखता हो। 
टिप्पण 4: ऐसे अधिकारियों के संबंध में विचार किया जाएगा, जो 
एक वर्ष की अवधि के भीतर सेवानिवृत होने वाले हैं या रिजर्व में 
स्थानांतरित किए जाने वाले हैं और जिनके पास अपेक्षित अनुभव 
Ae ASAT हैं। ऐसे व्यक्तियों को उस तारीख तक प्रतिनियुक्त के 
निबंधनों पर रखा जाएगा जिस तारीख से उन्हें सशस्त्र बल से 
निर्मुक्त किया जाना है, तत्पश्चात्‌ उन्हें पुनर्नियोजन पर बने रहने 
दिया जा सकता है। 
टिप्पण 2: पोषक प्रवर्ग के ऐसे विभागीय अधिकारी, जो प्रोन्नति 
की सीधी पंक्ति में है, प्रतिनियुक्ति के आधार पर नियुक्ति पर 
विचार के लिए पात्र नहीं होंगे। इसी तरह, प्रतिनियुक्त अधिकारी 
प्रोन्नति द्वारा नियुक्ति पर विचार के लिए पात्र नहीं होंगे। 


228 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 


[PART II—SEC. 4] 


टिप्पण 3: प्रतिनियुक्ति की अवधि जिसके अंतर्गत केन्द्रीय सरकार 
के उसी या किसी अन्य संगठन या विभाग में इस नियुक्ति से ठीक 
पहले धारित किसी अन्य बाह्य संवर्ग पद पर प्रतिनियुक्ति की 
अवधि साधारणतया तीन वर्ष से अधिक नहीं होगी। 

टिप्पण 4: प्रतिनियुक्ति द्वारा नियुक्ति के लिए अधिकतम आयु 
सीमा आवेदन प्राप्त करने की अंतिम तारीख को 56 वर्ष से अधिक 


नहीं होगी। 
(2) (73) 
समूह 'क' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति (प्रोन्नति के संबंध में विचार करने के लिए) :- लागू नहीं होता। 
4. अध्यक्ष भर्ती एवं मूल्यांकन केन्द्र, रक्षा अनुसंधान और विकास संगठन - अध्यक्ष; 
2. महानिदेशक, रक्षा अनुसंधान और विकास संगठन या वैज्ञानिक 'एच' - सदस्य; 
3. मुख्य कार्यकारी (सिविल निर्माण एवं संपदा), अनुसंधान एवं विकास - सदस्य; 
4. निदेशक, कार्मिक अनुसंधान एवं विकास संगठन - सदस्य 
समूह 'क' विभागीय पुष्टीकरण समिति (पुष्टीकरण के संबंध में विचार किए जाने हेतु) 
4. अध्यक्ष, भर्ती एवं मूल्यांकन केन्द्र रक्षा अनुसंधान एवं विकास संगठन - अध्यक्ष; 
2. महानिदेशक, रक्षा अनुसंधान एवं विकास संगठन या वैज्ञानिक 'एच' - सदस्य; 
3. मुख्य कार्यपालक (सिविल निर्माण एवं संपदा), अनुसंधान एवं विकास - सदस्य; 
4. निदेशक, कार्मिक अनुसंधान एवं विकास संगठन - सदस्य 
() (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7) 
5. संनिर्माण | 24* साधारण वेतन मैट्रिक्स | चयन | पैंतीस वर्ष से (क) आवश्यकः 
इंजीनियर (2023) केन्द्रीय सेवा, |X  rqaeT4 अधिक नहीं (i) किसी मान्यता प्राप्त 
सह-उप *कार्यभार के | समूह 'क! (67700- (केन्द्रीय सरकार विश्वविद्यालय/ संस्थान से 
परियोजना | आधार पर राजपत्रित 208700 रु.) द्वारा सिविल/विद्युत/यांत्रिक 
प्रबंधक परिवर्तन किया | (तकनीकी) समय-समय पर इंजीनियरी या स्थापत्य कला 
जा सकता है। जारी में स्नातक डिग्री या समतुल्य; 
किए गए अनुदेशों (ii) सरकारी सेवा अथवा अर्द्ध 
या सरकारी या स्थानीय निकाय में 
आदेशों के अनुसार | दायित्व वाले पदों पर रहते हुए 
सरकारी सेवकों के | सिविल संनिर्माण के नियोजन 
लिए अथवा निष्पादन में चार वर्ष 
शिथिल करके पांच. | का अनुभव। जिसमें से सिविल 
वर्ष निर्माण के नियोजन और 
तक की जा सकती | निष्पादन का साइट या Paes 
है।) में दो वर्ष का अनुभव हो; या 
टिप्पणः आयु-सीमा | (7) संपदा प्रबंधन में चार वर्ष 
अवधारित करने के | का अनुभव (अर्थात अतिक्रमण, 
लिए विकास भोगाधिकारों एवं 
निर्णायक तारीख मुकदमेबाजी तथा इनसे 
अभ्यर्थियों से आवेदन | संबंधित अन्य मामले) वहां बसे 
प्राप्त करने के लिए | लोगों के लिए नागरिक 
नियत की गई अंतिम | सुविधाओं की व्यवस्था करने, 
तारीख होगी, tf | संपदा, वृक्षसंवर्धन एवं 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 


229 


वह पर्यावरणीय स्वास्थ, नागरिक 
अंतिम तारीख जो | करों और इनसे संबंधित अन्य 
असम, मामलों तथा भूमि अधिग्रहण, 
मेघालय, अरूणाचल | विधियों, भूमि मूल्य निर्धारण 
प्रदेश तकनीकों, बातचीत द्वारा तय 
मिजोरम, मणिपुर, | क्रय अथवा अचल संपत्ति को 
नागालैंड, त्रिपुरा, किराए पर लेने से संबंधित 
सिक्किम और लाहोल | नियमों की विशेषज्ञ के रूप में 
तथा स्पीति जिले, | जानकारी। 
हिमाचल प्रदेश के | अथवा 
चम्बा (iv) सिविल संककर्मों के 
जिले के पांगी उपखंड,  चालू/अंतिम बिलों की 
लद्दाख, अंडमान और | पुनरीक्षण, संविदा 
निकोबार द्वीप और | दस्तावेजों/।विचलन आदेशों की 
लक्षद्वीप के संघ राज्य | संवीक्षा करने और संविदाओं के 
क्षेत्र के अभ्यर्थियों के | संशोधनों, सिविल संकर्मों के 
लिए विहित की गई | बजट का नियंत्रण, भंडारों की 
है।) लेखा परीक्षा का कम से कम 
चार वर्ष का अनुभव और 
कंप्यूटर. कार्यक्रमण/पद्धति 
विश्लेषण का ज्ञान। 
(ख) वांछनीयः 


() समयबद्ध परियोजनाओं से 
संबंधित संकर्मों की योजना 
बनाने/परिकल्पना करने का 
अनुभव। 

(ii) बजट मानीटर करने और 
संकर्म व्यय का नियंत्रण करने 
तथा आवास-सुविधा संबंधी 


पैमानों का ज्ञान। 
(8) (9) (0) (4) 
लागू नहीं | सीधी भर्ती के लिए (i) पचास प्रतिशत प्रोन्नतिः वेतन मैट्रिक्स में स्‍तर 40 (5600-477500 रु.) में 
होता। एक वर्ष। टिप्पणीः प्रोन्नति द्वारा जिसके न हो | ऐसा उप निर्माण अभियंता-सह-सहायक परियोजना प्रबंधक 
केन्द्रीय सरकार के सकने पर प्रतिनियुक्ति/ | जिसने नियमित आधार पर उस श्रेणी में पांच वर्ष के लिए सेवा 
निर्देशानुसार आमेलन द्वारा, दोनों के न | की हो। 
परिवीक्षा की सफल | हो सकने पर सीधी भर्ती | टिप्पण: जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में जिन्होंने अपनी 
समाप्ति के लिए कम से | द्वारा; अर्हक या पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर ली हो, प्रोन्नति के लिए विचार 
कम दो सप्ताह का एक | (ii) पचास प्रतिशत किया जा रहा हो, वहां उनसे ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में भी 
अनिवार्य समावेशन॒ | प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन विचार किया जाएगा, परन्तु यह तब जबकि उनके द्वारा की गई 
प्रशिक्षण होगा। द्वारा जिसके न हो सकने | ऐसी अर्हक या पात्रता सेवा, अपेक्षित aH या पात्रता सेवा के 
पर सीधी भर्ती द्वारा। आधे से अधिक से या दो वर्ष से इनमें से जो भी कम हो, कम न हो 


और उन्होंने अपने ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों सहित, जिन्होंने ऐसी 
Heh या पात्रता सेवा पहले ही पूरी कर ली है, अगली उच्चतर 
श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के लिए अपनी परिवीक्षा की अवधि 
सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली हो। 


230 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 


[PART II—SEC. 4] 


प्रतिनियुक्तिआमेलन (सिविलियन अधिकारी): केन्द्रीय सरकार 
या अन्य विभागों या राज्य सरकार या सार्वजनिक उपक्रमों के ऐसे 
सिविलियन अधिकारीः 
(क) () जो नियमित आधार पर सदृश पद धारण किए हुए हैं। 

(ii) जिन्होंने वेतन मैट्रिक्स (564400-477500/-) में स्तर- 

40 में नियमित आधार पर उस श्रेणी में दो वर्ष की सेवा 
की हो। 

(ख) जिनके पास सीधी भर्ती के लिए निर्धारित अनुभव एवं 
शैक्षिक अर्हताएं हो। 
टिप्पण 4: पोषक प्रवर्ग के ऐसे विभागीय अधिकारी जो प्रोन्नति 
की सीधी पंक्ति में हैं, प्रतिनियुक्ति पर नियुक्ति के लिए विचार 
किए जाने के पात्र नहीं होंगे। इसी प्रकार, प्रतिनियुक्त व्यक्ति 
प्रोन्नति द्वारा नियुक्ति के लिए विचार किए जाने के पात्र नहीं 
होंगे। 
टिप्पण 2: प्रतिनियुक्ति की अवधि जिसके अंतर्गत केन्द्रीय सरकार 
के उसी या किसी अन्य संगठन या विभाग में इस नियुक्ति से ठीक 
पहले धारित किसी अन्य पूर्व काडर पद पर प्रतिनियुक्ति की 
अवधि है, साधारणतया तीन वर्ष से अधिक नहीं होगी। 
टिप्पण 3: प्रतिनियुक्ति द्वारा नियुक्ति के लिए अधिकतम आयु 
सीमा आवेदन प्राप्त करने की अंतिम तारीख को 56 वर्ष से अधिक 
नहीं होगी। 


(72) (73) 
समूह “क' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति (प्रोन्नति के संबंध में विचार करने के लिए) :- लागू नहीं होता। 
L. अध्यक्ष भर्ती एवं मूल्यांकन केन्द्र रक्षा अनुसंधान और विकास संगठन - अध्यक्ष; 
2. निदेशक, कार्मिक निदेशालय अनुसंधान और विकास संगठन - सदस्य; 
3. मुख्य कार्यकारी (सिविल निर्माण एवं संपदा), अनुसंधान एवं विकास - सदस्य; 
4. tat अनुसंधान एवं विकास विभाग के एक अधिकारी जो वैज्ञानिक “ST 
अथवा समकक्ष रैंक से नीचे नहीं हो - सदस्य 
समूह क' विभागीय पुष्टीकरण समिति (पुष्टीकरण के संबंध में विचार करने के लिए)- 
|. महानिदेशक, रक्षा अनुसंधान एवं विकास संगठन या वैज्ञानिक एच! 
- अध्यक्ष; 
2. मुख्य कार्यपालक (सिविल कार्य एवं संपदा), अनुसंधान एवं विकास 
- सदस्य; 
3. कार्मिक, अनुसंधान एवं विकास संगठन के निदेशक 
- सदस्य; 
4. रक्षा अनुसंधान एवं विकास विभाग के एक अधिकारी जो वैज्ञानिक 'डी' 
अथवा समकक्ष रैंक से नीचे नहीं हो। 
- सदस्य 
(() (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7) 
6. उप निर्माण | 43* साधारण | वेतन मैट्रिक्स | चयन | पैंतीस वर्ष (केन्द्रीय अनिवार्य: 
अभियंता-सह- | (2023) केन्द्रीय (56400- सरकार द्वारा समय- | () मान्यता प्राप्त विश्वविद्यालय 
सहायक *(कार्य भार | सेवा, समूह | 777500 रु.) समय पर जारी या संस्थान से सिविल या 


[भाग ]---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 23] 
परियोजना के आधार पर | क! में स्तर 0 आदेशों अथवा दिशा- | इलैक्ट्रिकल या मैकेनिकल 
प्रबंधक परिवर्तन राजपत्रित निर्देशों के अनुसार इंजीनियरिंग या आर्किटेक्टर 
किया जा (तकनीकी) सरकारी कर्मचारियों | इंजीनीयरिंग या समकक्ष में 
सकता है)। के लिए पांच वर्ष की | स्नातक या समकक्ष डिग्री 
आयु तक की छूट)। अथवा 
टिप्पणी: आयु सीमा | ( इंजीनियरिंग में न्यूनतम 
निर्धारण की अंतिम तीन वर्ष का डिप्लोमा के साथ 
तारीख अभ्यर्थियों केन्द्रीय सरकार या राज्य 
द्वारा आवेदन प्राप्त सरकारों या अन्य विभाग या 
किए जाने हेतु सार्वजनिक उपक्रमों में निर्माण 
निर्धारित अंतिम कार्यों एवं संपदा प्रबंधन की 
तारीख होगी एवं योजना एवं निष्पादन में कम से 
असम, मेघालय, कम दस वर्षों का संबंधित 
अरुणाचल प्रदेश, अनुभव। 
मिजोरम, मणिपुर, (ख) arate: 
नागालैंड, त्रिपुरा, () आवास के स्तरों, निर्माण 
सिक्किम, लाहोल एवं | कार्य परियोजनाओं की 
स्पिति जिला एवं संरचना, परियोजना आकलनों 
हिमाचल प्रदेश के या संविदा दस्तावेजों की 
चम्बा जिला के पणजी | तैयारी आदि का ज्ञान; 
अनुभाग तथा लद्दाख, | (ii) अनुसंधान एवं विकास 
अंडमान एवं निकोबार | स्थापनाओं या प्रयोगशालाओं 
द्वीपों एवं लक्ष्यद्षीपीं | के तकनीकी प्रशासनिक भवनों 
के संघ राज्य क्षेत्रों के | के डिजाइन एवं योजना में 
अभ्यर्थियों के लिए अनुभव। 
निर्धारित अंतिम 
तारीख नहीं होगी। 
(8) (9) (0) (') 
लागू. नहीं | सीधी भर्ती के लिए | (i) पचास प्रतिशत सीधी भर्ती | प्रोन्नतिः वेतन मैट्रिक्स (44900-42400 रू.) में वेतन स्तर- 
होता। दो वर्ष टिप्पणीः | द्वारा 7 में ऐसे सहायक निर्माण अभियंता जिन्होंने उस ग्रेड में 
केन्द्रीय सरकार के | (ii) पचीस प्रतिशत प्रोन्नति नियमित आधार पर पांच वर्ष सेवा की हो। 
निर्देशानुसार द्वारा जिसके न हो सकने पर | टिप्पणीः जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में जिन्होंने 
परिवीक्षा की सफल | सीधी भर्ती द्वारा एवं अपनी अहक या पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर ली हो, प्रोन्नति के लिए 
समाप्ति के लिए दो | (iii) पचीस प्रतिशत विचार किया जा रहा हो, वहां उनसे ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध 
सप्ताह का एक | प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन द्वारा में भी विचार किया जाएगा परन्तु यह तब जबकि उनके द्वारा 
अनिवार्य समावेशन | जिसके न हो सकने पर सीधी | की गई ऐसी asa या पात्रता सेवा, अपेक्षित sew या 
प्रशिक्षण होगा। भर्ती द्वारा। पात्रता सेवा के आधे से अधिक या दो वर्ष, इनमें से जो भी 


कम हो और उन्होंने अपने ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों सहित, 
जिन्होंने ऐसी अर्हक या पात्रता सेवा पहले ही पूरी कर ली है, 
अगली उच्चतर श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के लिए अपनी परिवीक्षा की 
अवधि सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली हो। 

प्रतिनियुक्ति/आमेलन (सिविलियन अधिकारी): 

केन्द्रीय सरकार या अन्य विभाग या राज्य सरकार या 
सार्वजनिक उपक्रम के संगठित अभियांत्रिकी सेवा के ऐसे 
सिविलियन अधिकारीः- 

(क) (i) जो मूल संवर्ग या विभाग में नियमित आधार पर 


232 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 


[PART II—SEC. 4] 


सदृश Tat को धारण किए हुए हो; या 

(ii) मूल संवर्ग या विभाग में वेतन मैट्रिक्स या समकक्ष 
में स्‍्तर-7 (44900-442400/-) में नियमित आधार पर पांच 
वर्ष सेवा की हो; या 
(ख) जिनके पास स्तंभ (7) के अधीन सीधी भर्ती के लिए 
निर्धारित अनुभव एवं शैक्षणिक अहताएं हो। 
टिप्पण 4: पोषक प्रवर्ग के ऐसे विभागीय अधिकारी, जो 
प्रोन्नति की सीधी पंक्ति में है, प्रतिनियुक्ति के आधार पर 
नियुक्ति पर विचार के लिए पात्र नहीं होंगे। इसी तरह 
प्रतिनियुक्त अधिकारी प्रोन्नति द्वारा नियुक्ति पर विचार के 
लिए पात्र नहीं होंगे। 
टिप्पण 2: प्रतिनियुक्ति की अवधि जिसके अंतर्गत केन्द्रीय 
सरकार के उसी या किसी अन्य संगठन या विभाग में इस 
नियुक्ति से ठीक पहले धारित किसी अन्य बाह्य संवर्ग पद पर 
प्रतिनियुक्ति की अवधि साधारणतया तीन वर्ष से अधिक नहीं 
होगी। 
टिप्पण 3: प्रतिनियुक्ति द्वारा नियुक्ति के लिए अधिकतम आयु 
सीमा आवेदन प्राप्त करने की अंतिम तारीख को छप्पन वर्ष से 


अधिक नहीं होगी। 
(72) (73) 

समूह 'क' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति (प्रोन्नति पर विचार करने के लिए) जिसमें निम्नलिखित सम्मिलित होंगे:- | लागू नहीं होता। 
4. अध्यक्ष भर्ती एवं मूल्यांकन केन्द्र रक्षा अनुसंधान एवं विकास संगठन - अध्यक्ष; 
2. कार्मिक,रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन के निदेशक - सदस्य; 
3. मुख्य कार्यपालक (सिविल कार्य एवं संपदा), - सदस्य; 
4. रक्षा अनुसंधान एवं विकास विभाग के एक अधिकारी जो वैज्ञानिक 'सी' 

या समकक्ष रैंक से नीचे नहीं हो - सदस्य 
समूह 'क' विभागीय पुष्टि समिति (पुष्टि के संबंध में विचार करने के लिए) जो निम्नलिखित से मिलकर बनेगी- 
l. महानिदेशक, रक्षा अनुसंधान एवं विकास संगठन या वैज्ञानिक 'एच' - अध्यक्ष; 
2. मुख्य कार्यकारी (सिविल निर्माण एवं संपदा) अनुसंधान एवं विकास - सदस्य; 
3. कार्मिक, अनुसंधान एवं विकास संगठन के निदेशक - सदस्य; 
4. 4. रक्षा अनुसंधान एवं विकास विभाग के एक अधिकारी जो वैज्ञानिक 'सी' 
या समकक्ष के रैंक से नीचे नहीं हो - सदस्य 

() (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7) 
7. सहायक | 9* (2023) साधारण केन्द्रीय | वेतन मैट्रिक्स (44900- | चयन लागू नहीं लागू नहीं 
निर्माण * कार्यभार के अनुसार | सेवा समूह 'ख', | 42400 रु.) में स्तर-7 होता। होता। 
अभियंता परीवर्तन किया जा राजपत्रित 

सकता है। (तकनीकी) 

(8) (9) (0) (4) 
लागू नहीं | लागू नहीं | (iii) प्रोन्नति द्वारा प्रोन्नतिः वेतन मैट्रिक्स (35400-442400 रू.) में स्तर-6 में ऐसे ज्येष्ठ 
होता। होता। अभियंता सहायक जिसने इस श्रेणी में नियमित आधार पर तीन वर्षों की 


[भाग ता--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : 


जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 233 


सेवा की हो। 

टिप्पण: जहां ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में जिन्होंने अपनी ade या 
पात्रता सेवा पूरी कर ली हो, प्रोन्नति के लिए विचार किया जा रहा हो, 
वहां उनसे ज्येष्ठ व्यक्तियों के संबंध में भी विचार किया जाएगा परन्तु यह 
तब जबकि उनके द्वारा की गई ऐसी अर्हक या पात्रता सेवा, अपेक्षित sew 
या पात्रता सेवा के आधे से अधिक या दो वर्ष, इनमें से जो भी कम हो और 
उन्होंने अपने ऐसे कनिष्ठ व्यक्तियों सहित, जिन्होंने ऐसी sen या पात्रता 
सेवा पहले ही पूरी कर ली है, अगली उच्चतर श्रेणी में प्रोन्नति के लिए 
अपनी परिवीक्षा की अवधि सफलतापूर्वक पूरी कर ली हो। 


(2) (73) 
समूह 'क' विभागीय प्रोन्नति समिति (प्रोन्नति पर विचार करने के लिए) जिसमें निम्नलिखित लागू नहीं होता। 
सम्मिलित होंगे:- 

4. महानिदेशक, रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन - अध्यक्ष; 
2. कार्मिक, रक्षा अनुसंधान तथा विकास संगठन के निदेशक - सदस्य; 
3. मुख्य कार्यकारी (सिविल कार्य एवं संपदा) - सदस्य; 
4. रक्षा अनुसंधान एवं विकास विभाग से एक अधिकारी जो वैज्ञानिक 'बी' 

या इसके समतुल्य के रैंक से नीचे न हो -सदस्य; 


l. 


[फा. सं. SteaeaeSt/7307/Mtaat कार्य/सी/पी/03/523/डी (आरएंडडी) तारीख 05 जून, 2023] 


हर्षा रानी, अवर सचिव 


(Department of Defence Research and Development) 
NOTIFICATION 
New Delhi, the 5th June, 2023 
S.R.O. 75.—In exercise of the powers conferred by the proviso to article 309 of the Constitution and in 
supersession of the Defence Research and Development Organisation, Ministry of Defence (Civil Works Officers 
Cadre) Recruitment Rules, 2000 and the Ministry of Defence, Defence Research and Development Organisation, 
Additional Chief Construction Engineer (Civil Works Officer’s Cadre) Recruitment Rules, 20l4, except as respects 
things done or omitted to be done before such supersession, the President hereby makes the following rules regulating 
the method of recruitment to the posts of Chief Executive (Civil Works and Estates), Chief Construction Engineer - 
cum-Associate Director (works), Additional Chief Construction Engineer, Deputy Chief Construction Engineer-cum- 
project Manager, Construction Engineer-cum-Deputy Project Manager, Deputy Construction Engineer-cum-Assistant 
Project Manager and Assistant Construction Engineer in the Construction Establishment, Defence Research and 
Development Organisation, Ministry of Defence, namely:- 


Short title and commencement.- (|) These rules may be called the Ministry of Defence, Defence Research and 
Development Organisation, Civil Works Officer Cadre (Group ‘A’ and (87 Posts) Recruitment Rules, 2023. 


(2) They shall come into force on the date of their publication in the Official Gazette. 


Application.- These rules shall apply to the posts as specified in column (l) of the Schedule annexed to these 


rules. 


Number of posts, classification and level in pay matrix.-The number of the said posts, their classifications 
and level in the pay matrix attached thereto shall be as specified in columns (2) to (4) of the said Schedule. 


Method of recruitment, age-limit, qualifications, etc. - The method of recruitment, age-limit, qualifications 
and other matters relating to the said posts shall be as specified in columns (5) to (I3) of the said Schedule. 


Disqualification.- No person,- 


(a) who has entered into or contracted a marriage with a person having a spouse living; or 


(b) who having a spouse living has entered into or contracted a marriage with any person, 


shall be eligible for appointment to the said posts: 


234 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 


[PART II—SEC. 4] 


Provided that the Central Government may, if satisfied that such marriage is permissible under the personal 
law applicable to such person and the other party to the marriage and that there are other grounds for so doing, exempt 
any person from the operation of this rule. 


6. Power to relax.-Where the Central Government is of the opinion that it is necessary or expedient so to do, it 
may, by order and for reasons to be recorded in writing and in consultation with the Union Public Service 
Commission, relax any of the provisions of these rules with respect to any class or category of persons. 


7. Saving.- Nothing in these rules shall affect reservation, relaxation of age-limit and other concessions required to 
be provided for the Scheduled Castes, the Scheduled Tribes, the Other Backward Classes, the Ex-servicemen 
and other special categories of persons in accordance with the orders issued by the Central Government from 
time to time in this regard. 


SCHEDULE 
Name of Number of Classification. | Level in pay Whether Age - limit Educational 
posts. posts. matrix. selection for direct and other 
post or recruits. qualifications 
non- required for 
selection direct 
post. recruits. 
dQ) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7) 
l. Chief [के General Level-l4 inthe | Selection. Not Not applicable. 
Executive (2023) Central pay matrix applicable. 
(Civil Works | Subject to Service, (Rs. 44200 - 
and Estates). | variation Group ‘A’, 28200). 
dependent on Gazetted 
work load. (Technical). 


Whether age and 


Period of 


Method of recruitment 


In case of recruitment by promotion or by 


educational probation, if | whether by direct deputation / absorption, grades from which 

qualifications any. recruitment or by promotion | promotion or deputation / absorption to be made. 

prescribed for or by deputation / absorption 

direct recruits will and percentage of the 

apply in the case of vacancies to be filled by 

promotees. various methods. 

(8) (9) (0) (l) 

Not applicable. Not By promotion failing which | Promotion: Chief Construction Engineer-cum- 

applicable. | by deputation. Associate Director (Works) level-I3A in the pay 


matrix (Rs. 3l00-26600) with two 
years regular service in the grade. 


Note: Where juniors who have completed their 
qualifying or eligibility service are being 
considered for promotion, their seniors would 
also be considered provided they are not short of 
the requisite qualifying or eligibility service by 
more than half of such qualilfying or eligibility 
service or two years, whichever is less and have 
successfully completed their probation period for 
promotion to the next higher grade alongwith 
their juniors who have already completed such 
qualifying or eligibility service. 

Deputation / absorption: Civilian officers of the 
organised engineering services of the Central 
Government or other Departments or State 
Governments or public sector undertakings, - 


(i) holding analogous posts on regular basis 
in the parent cadre or Department; or 


(ii) with two years regular service in posts in 
level — I3A in the pay matrix (Rs 3|00 - 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 


235 


26600). 


Note l: The Departmental officers in the feeder 
category who are in the direct line of promotion 
shall not be eligible for consideration for 
appointment on deputation. Similarly, 
deputationists shall not be eligible for 
consideration for appointment by promotion. 


Note 2: Period of deputation including period of 
deputation in another Ex-cadre post held 
immediately preceding this appointment in the 
same or some other organisation or Department 
of the Central Government shall ordinarily not 
exceeding three years. 

Note 3: The maximum age-limit for appointment 
by deputation shall not be exceeding fifty-six 
years as on closing date of receipt of applications. 


If a Departmental Promotion Committee exists, what is its composition. Circumstances in which Union 
Public Service Commission is to be 
consulted in making recruitment. 

(2) (43) 

Group ‘A’ Departmental Promotion Committee (for considering promotion) | Not applicable. 

consisting of:- 

l. Chairman, Recruitment and Assessment Centre, Defence 

Research and Development Organisation — Chairman; 
2. Chairman Defence Research and Development Organisation — Member; 
3. Two Directors General, Defence Research and Development 
Organisation — Member. 
Q) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7) 

2. Chief 6* General Level-l3A in the | Selection. | Not exceeding Essential: 

Construction | (2023) Central pay matrix fifty years of (i) Bachelor 

Engineer- Subject to Service, (Rs. 300 - age. (Relaxable Degree or 

cum- variation Group ‘A’, | 2l6600). for the equivalent in 

Associate dependent on Gazetted Government Civil or 

Director work load. (Technical). servants upto the | Electrical or 

(Works). age of five years | Mechanical 


in accordance 
with the 
instructions or 


Engineering or 
in Architecture 
froma 


orders issued by | recognised 

the Central University or 
Government institutions; 
from time to 

time). (ii) twelve years 
Note: The experience in 


crucial date for 
determining the 
age-limit shall be 
the closing date 
for receipt of 


planning or 
execution of 
major time - 
bound projects 
of workshops or 


applications Factories or 
from candidates | research 

and not the establishments; 
closing date or 


prescribed for 


(iii) experience 


236 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 [PART II—SEc. 4] 
those in Assam, in estate 
Meghalaya , management 
Arunachal (i.e. 
Pradesh, encroachments, 
Mizoram, development, 
Manipur, usufructs, 
Nagaland, litigation and the 
Tripura, Sikkim | matters relating 
and Lahaul and thereto) 
Spiti District and | provision of 
Pangi Sub- civic amenities 
Division of for inhabited 
Chamba District | estates, arbori- 
of Himachal culture and 
Pradesh and the | environmental 
Union territories | health, civic 
of Ladakh, taxes and the 
Andaman and matters relating 
Nicobar Islands | thereto and 
and expert 
Lakshadweep. knowledge of 
land acuisition 
laws, land 
valuation 
techniques, rules 
related to 
negotiated 
purchase or 
hiring of 
immovable 
property. 
(8) (9) (0) e89) 
Not applicable. | One year for direct | By promotion, Promotion: Additional Chief Construction Engineer 
recruitment. failing which by level-I3 in the pay matrix (Rs. !2300-2!5900) with 


Note: There shall 
be a mandatory 
induction training 
of at least two 
weeks duration for 
successful 
completion of 
probation as 
prescribed by the 
Central 
Government. 


deputation/ 
absorption or re- 
employment of 
ex-service 
officers, failing 
both by direct 
recruitment. 


two years regular service in the grade. 

Note: Where juniors who have completed qualifying or 
eligibility service are being considered for promotion, 
their seniors would also be considered provided they are 
not short of the requisite qualifying or eligibility service 
by more than half of such qualifying or eligibility 
service or two years, whichever is less and have 
successfully completed their probation period for 
promotion to the next higher grade along with their 
juniors who have already completed such qualifying or 
eligibility service. 

Deputation / absorption (Civilian Officers) : Civilian 
Officers of the organised engineering service of the 
Central Government or other Departments or State 
Governments or public sector undertakings,- 

(a) Gi) holding analogous posts on regular basis in the 
parent cadre or department; or 

(ii) with two years regular service in posts in the 

level — 3 in the pay matrix (Rs. !2300-25900). 

(b) possessing the experience and _ educational 
qualification prescribed for direct recruitment under 
column (7). 

Deputation / absorption or re-employment (service 
officers),- 

(i) Engineer officers from the services of the rank of () 


[भाग त---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 237 


Colonel pay level-I3 in the Defence pay matrix 
(Rs. 25700-24000) or equivalent with five years 
experience in the rank in planning or execution of civil 
works of major time-bound projects of Workshops or 
Factories or Research Establishments or Lieutenant 
Colonel or equivalent with seven years’ regular service 
in the rank; and 

(ii) possessing the prescribed experience and educational 
qualification for direct recruitment. The officers due to 
retire or those who are to be transferred to reserve 
category within a period of one year and have the 
requisite experience and qualification shall also be 
considered. If selected such persons shall be given 
deputation terms up to the date on which they are due 
for release from the Armed Forces, thereafter, they may 
be continued on re-employment terms. In case such 
eligible officers have been retired or have been 
transferred to reserve before the actual selection to the 
post is made their appointment will be on _ re- 
employment basis (re-employment upto the date 
superannuation with reference to civil posts). 

Note i: The Departmental officers in the feeder 
category who are in the direct line of promotion shall 
not be eligible for consideration for appointment on 
deputation Similarly, deputationists shall not be eligible 
for consideration for appointment by promotion. 

Note 2: The period of deputation or contract including 
period of deputation or contract in another Ex-cadre post 
held immediately preceding this appointment in the 
same or some other organisation or department of the 
Central Government shall ordinarily not exceed three 
years. 

Note 3: The maximum age-limit for appointment by 
deputation shall not be exceeding fifty-six years as on 
the closing date of receipt of applications. 


(2) (43) 

Group ‘A’ Departmental Promotion Committee (for considering promotion) consisting of:- Not applicable. 
l. Chairman, recruitment and assessment centre, Defence Research 

and Development Organisation — Chairman; 
2. Director General, Defence Research and Development Organisation 

or Scientist ‘H’ —Member; 
3. Chief Executive (civil works and estates), research and development — Member; 
4. Director of personnel, research and development organisation — Member. 


Group ‘A’ Departmental Confirmation Committee (for considering confirmation) consisting 
of:- 
l. Chairman, recruitment and assessment centre, Defence Research 


and Development Organisation — Chairman; 
2. Director General, Defence Research and Development Organisation 
or Scientist ‘H’ —Member; 
3. Chief Executive (civil works and estates), research and development — Member; 
4. Director of personnel, research and development organisation — Member. 
() (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7) 
3. 0* General Level-3 in Selection. Not exceeding | (a) Essential: 
Additional | (2023) Central the pay matrix fifty years of | (i) Bachelor Degree 
Chief * Subject to Service, (Rs 2300- age. or equivalent in Civil 
Construction | Variation Group ‘A’, | 25900). (Relaxable for | or Electrical or 
Engineer. dependent on Gazetted, the Mechanical 
Government 


238 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 


[PART II—SEC. 4] 


workload. 


(Technical). 


servants upto 
the age of five 
years in 
accordance 
with the 
instructions or 
orders issued 
by the Central 
Government 
from time to 
time). 

Note: The 
crucial date 
for 
determining 
the 

age-limit shall 
be the closing 
date for 
receipt of 
applications 
from 
candidates and 
not the closing 
date 
prescribed for 
those in 
Assam, 
Meghalaya , 
Arunachal 
Pradesh, 
Mizoram, 
Manipur, 
Nagaland, 
Tripura, 
Sikkim and 
Lahaul and 
Spiti District 
and Pangi 
Sub-Division 
of Chamba 
District of 
Himachal 
Pradesh and 
the Union 
territories of 
Ladakh, 
Andaman and 
Nicobar 
Islands and 
Lakshadweep. 


Engineering or 
Architecture 
Engineering from a 
recognised 
University or 
institutions; 

(ii) ten years 
experience in 
planning or 
execution of civil 
works in a 
responsible position 
in a Government 
service or in a semi 
Government or local 
body; 

(iii) experience in 
planning 

or execution of 
major time- bound 
projects of 
Workshops or 
Factories or research 
establishments in a 
responsible position 
in a Government 
service or in a semi 
Government or local 
body; or 

(iv) experience in 
estate management 
in a responsible 
position in the 
Government or local 
body (i.e. 
encroachments, 
development, 
usufructs and 
litigation and other 
matters relating 
thereto) provision of 
civic amenities for 
inhabited, estates, 
arboriculture and 
environmental 
health, civic taxes 
and other matters 
relating thereto and 
expert knowledge of 
land acquisition, 
laws, land valuation 
techniques, rules 
related to negotiated 
purchase or hiring of 
immovable property. 
(b) Desirable: 


Knowledge of scales 
of accommodation, 
budget monitoring 
and quantity 


[भाग ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 


239 


fo si surveying. ___ | surveying. 


(8) (9) (0) (l) 

Not applicable. | One year for direct | (i) seventy-five Promotion: Deputy Chief Construction Engineer-cum- 
recruitment. per cent. by Project Manager level-l2 in the pay matrix (Rs. 78800- 
Note: There shall promotion failing | 209200) with five years service in the grade. 
be a mandatory which by Note: Where juniors who have completed their 
induction training | deputation / qualifying or eligibility service are being considered for 
of at least two absorption, failing | promotion, their seniors shall also be considered 
weeks duration for | both by direct provided they are not short of the requisite qualifying or 


successful 
completion of 
probation as 
prescribed by the 
Central 
Government. 


recruitment; (ii) 
twenty-five per 
cent. by 
deputation / 
absorption failing 
which by re- 
employment of 
ex-service officers 
failing both by 
direct recruitment. 


eligibility service by more than half of such qualifying 
or eligibility service or two years, whichever is less, and 
have successfully completed their probation period for 
promotion to the next higher grade along with their 
juniors, who have already completed such qualifying or 
eligibility service. 
Deputation/absorption (Civilian Officers): Civilian 
Officers of the organised Engineering services of the 
Central Government or other departments or State 
Governments or public sector undertakings,- 
(a) Gi) holding analogous posts on regular basis in the 
parent cadre or department; or 

(ii) with five years regular service in grade 
rendered after appointment thereto on regular basis in 
thelevel-2 in the pay matrix (Rs. 78800-209200) in the 
parent cadre or department; and 
(b) possessing the educational qualifications and 
experience prescribed for direct recruitment under 
column (7). 
Deputation / absorption or re-employment (service 
officers),- 
Engineers officers from the services of the rank of,- 
(i) Colonel pay level-!3 in the Defence pay matrix 
(Rs. 25700-2!4000) or equivalent; or 
(ii) Lieutenant Colonel pay level-l2A in the Defence 
pay matrix (Rs. 6700-20700) or equivalent with five 
years regular service in the rank; and 
(iii) possessing the prescribed educational qualifications 
and experience for direct recruitment under column (7). 
Note i: The officers who are due to retire, or those who 
are to be transferred to ‘reserve’ category within a 
period of one year and having the requisite experience 
and qualification shall also be considered and if selected 
such persons would be given deputation terms upto the 
date on which they are due for release from the Armed 
Forces, thereafter they may be continued on re- 
employment terms. 
Note 2: The Departmental officers in the feeder 
category who are in the direct line of promotion shall 
not be eligible for consideration for appointment on 
deputation. Similarly, deputationists shall not be eligible 
for consideration for appointment by promotion. 


Note 3: Period of deputation including period of 
deputation in another ex-cadre post held immediately 
preceding this appointment in the same or some other 
Organisation or Department of the Central Government 
shall ordinarily not exceed three years. 


240 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 


[PART II—SEC. 4] 


Note 4: The maximum age-limit for appointment on 
deputation shall not exceed fifty-six years as on the 
closing date of receipt of applications. 


(2) (43) 

Group ‘A’ Departmental Promotion Committee (for considering promotion) consisting of:- Not applicable. 
l. Chairman, recruitment and assessment centre, Defence Research 

and Development Organisation — Chairman; 
2. Director General, Defence Research and Development Organisation 

or Scientist ‘H’ —Member; 
3. Chief Executive (civil works and estates — Member; 
4. Director of personnel, Defence Research and Development Organisation — Member. 
Group ‘A’ Departmental Confirmation Committee (for considering confirmation) consisting 
of:- 
l. Chairman, recruitment and assessment centre, Defence Research 

and Development Organisation — Chairman; 
2. Director General, Defence Research and Development Organisation 

or Scientist ‘H’ —Member; 
3. Chief Executive (civil works and estates), research and development — Member; 
4. Director of personnel, research and development organisation — Member. 

Q) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7) 

4. Deputy 6* General Level-2 in the | Selection. Not exceeding | (a) Essential: 
Chief (2023) Central pay matrix forty five (i) Bachelor Degree 
Construction | * Subject to Service, (Rs 78800- years of age. or equivalent in 
Engineer- variation Group ‘A’ | 209200). (Relaxable for | Civil or Electrical 
cum-Project | dependent on , Gazetted the or Mechanical 
Manager. workload. (Technical). Government Engineering or in 


servants upto 
the age of five 
years in 
accordance 
with the 
instructions or 
orders issued 
by the Central 
Government 
from time to 
time). 

Note: The 
crucial date for 
determining 
the age-limit 
shall be the 
closing date 
for receipt of 
applications 
from 
candidates and 
not the closing 
date prescribed 
for those in 
Assam, 
Meghalaya, 
Arunachal 
Pradesh, 
Mizoram, 


Architecture from a 
recognised 
University or 
institutions; 

(ii) at least eight 
years experience in 
planning and 
execution of civil 
works; and 

(iii) experience in 
planning 

or execution of 
major time- bound 
projects of 
workshops or 
factories or 
research 
establishments; or 
(iv) experience in 
estate management 
(i.e. encroachments, 
development, 
usufructs, litigation 
and the matters 
relating thereto) 
provision of civic 
amenities for 
inhabited estates, 
arbori-culture and 


[भाग त---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 24] 
Manipur, environmental 
Nagaland, health, civic taxes 
Tripura, and the matters 
Sikkim, relating thereto and 
Lahaul and expert knowledge 
Spiti District of land acquisition 
and Pangi laws, land valuation 
Sub-Division | techniques, rules 
of Chamba related to 
District of negotiated purchase 
Himachal or hiring of 
Pradesh and immovable 
the Union property. 
territories of (b) Desirable: 
Ladakh, (i) Degree in 
Andaman and | Building and 
Nicobar quantity surveying 
Islands and from 
Lakshadweep. | institute of 

surveyors; 
(ii) knowledge of 
Budget control and 
monitoring of Civil 
works. 
(iii) Experience in 
formulation and 
planning of civil 
works. 

(8) (9) (0) (I) 

Not applicable. | One year for direct | (i) seventy five Promotion: Construction Engineer-cum-Deputy Project 
recruitment. per cent. by Manager level-i] in the pay matrix (Rs.67700-208700) 
Note: There shall promotion failing | with five years regular service in the grade. 
be a mandatory which by Note: Where juniors who have completed qualifying 
induction training deputation / or eligibility service are being considered for promotion 
of at least two absorption failing | their seniors would also be considered provided they are 
weeks duration for | both by direct not short of the requisite qualifying or eligibility service 

recruitment; 


successful 
completion of 
probation as 
prescribed by the 
Central 
Government. 


(ii) twenty five 
per cent. by 
deputation / 
absorption failing 
which by re- 
employment of 
ex-service officers 
failing both by 
direct recruitment. 


by more than half of such qualifying or eligibility 
service or two years, whichever is less and have 
successfully completed their probation period for 
promotion to the next higher grade along with their 
juniors, who have already completed such qualifying or 
eligibility service. 

Deputation / absorption (Civilian Officers) : Civilian 
Officers of the organised engineering service of the 
Central Government or other Departments or State 
Governments or public sector undertakings.- 


(a) G) holding analogous posts on regular basis in the 
parent cadre or department; 


(ii) with five years regular service in posts in level 
न ] in the pay matrix (Rs 67700-208700). 


(b) possessing the experience and _ educational 
qualification prescribed for direct recruitment under 
column (7). Deputation / absorption or re-employment 
(service officers): Engineer officers from the services of 
the rank of 


(i) Lieutenant Colonel pay level-l2A in the 
Defence pay matrix (Rs. !6700-20700) or equivalent; 


242 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 


[PART II—SEC. 4] 


(ii) Major pay level-! in the Defence pay matrix (Rs. 
69400-36900) or equivalent with five years regular 
service in the rank; and 


(iii) possessing the prescribed experience and 
educational qualification for direct recruitment under 
column (7). 


Note i: The officers due to retire or those who are to be 
transferred to reserve category within a period of one 
year and have the requisite experience and qualification 
shall also be considered. If selected such persons shall 
be given deputation terms up to the date on which they 
are due for release from the Armed Forces, thereafter, 
they may be continued on re-employment terms. 


Note 2: The Departmental officers in the feeder 
category who are in the direct line of promotion shall 
not be eligible for consideration for appointment on 
deputation Similarly, deputationists shall not be eligible 
for consideration for appointment by promotion. 


Note 3: The period of deputation or contract including 
period of deputation or contract in another Ex-cadre post 
held immediately preceding this appointment in the 
same or some other organisation or department of the 
Central Government shall ordinarily not exceed three 
years. 

Note 4: The maximum age-limit for appointment by 
deputation shall not be exceeding fifty-six years as on 
the closing date of receipt of applications. 


(2) (3) 
Group ‘A’ Departmental Promotion Committee (for considering promotion) consisting of:- | Not applicable. 
l. Chairman, recruitment and assessment centre. Defence Research 
and Development Organisation — Chairman; 
2. Director General, Defence Research and Development Organisation 
or Scientist ‘H’ —Member; 
3. Chief Executive (civil works and estates), Research and Development — Member; 
4. Director of personnel, Research and Development Organisation — Member. 
Group ‘A’ Departmental Confirmation Committee (for considering confirmation) 
consisting of:- 
l. Chairman, recruitment and assessment centre. Defence Research 
and Development Organisation — Chairman; 
2. Director General, Defence Research and Development Organisation 
or Scientist ‘H’ —Member; 
3. Chief Executive (civil works and estates), Research and Development — Member; 
4. Director of personnel, Research and Development Organisation — Member. 
() (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7) 
5. Construction | 2I* General Level-l] in Selection. | Not exceeding | (a) Essential: 
Engineer-cum- (2023) Central the pay thirty-five (i) Bachelor Degree 
Deputy Project * Subject to Service matrix years of age. or equivalent in Civil 
Manager. राधा Group ‘A’ , (Rs 67700- (Relaxable for | 6 Rlectrical or 
dependent एस 4 ॥ 208700): the Mechanical 
work load. (Technical). Government | Engineering or in 
servants upto | Architecture froma 
the age of five | recognised 
years in University or 


[भाग त--खण्ड 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 


243 


accordance 
with the 
instructions or 
orders issued 
by the Central 
Government 
from time to 
time). 

Note: The 
crucial date 
for 
determining 
the age-limit 
shall be the 
closing date 
for receipt of 
applications 
from 
candidates and 
not the closing 
date 
prescribed for 
those in 
Assam, 
Meghalaya, 
Arunachal 
Pradesh, 
Mizoram, 
Manipur, 
Nagaland, 
Tripura, 
Sikkim, 
Lahaul and 
Spiti District 
and Panji Sub- 
Division of 
Chamba 
District of 
Himachal 
Pradesh and 
the Union 
territories of 
Ladakh, 
Andaman and 
Nicobar 
Islands and 
Lakshadweep. 


institutions; 


(ii) At least four 
years experience in 
planning and 
execution of civil 
works out of which at 
least two years 
should be on site or 
field; or 

(iii) at least four 
years experience in 
estate management 
(i.e. encroachments, 
development, 
usufructs, litigation 
and the matters 
relating thereto) 
provision of civic 
amenities for 
inhabited estates, 
arbori-culture and 
environmental health, 
civic taxes and the 
matters relating 
thereto and expert 
knowledge of Land 
acquisition laws, 
Land valuation 
techniques, rules 
related to negotiated 
purchase or hiring of 
immovable property; 
or 


(iv) atleast four 
years, experience in 
vetting of running or 
final bills of civil 
works, scrutiny of 
contracts documents 
or deviation orders 
and amendments to 
contracts, control of 
civil works budget, 
stores audit with 
exposure to computer 
programming or 
system analysis. 

(b) Desirable: 

(i) experience in 
planning or design of 
works connected 
with time bound 
projects; 

(ii) knowledge of 
Budget control and 
monitoring and 
control of work 
expenditure and 
scales of 


244 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 [PART II—SEc. 4] 
accommodations. 
(8) (9) (0) (l) 
Not applicable. | One year for direct | (4) fifty percent. | Promotion: Deputy Construction Engineer-cum- 


recruitment. 


Note: There shall 
be a mandatory 
induction training 
of at least two 
weeks duration for 
successful 
completion of 
probation as 
prescribed by the 
Central 
Government. 


by promotion 
failing which by 
deputation / 
absorption failing 
both by direct 
recruitment; 
(ii) fifty 
cent. by 
deputation / 
absorption, 
failing which by 
direct 
recruitment. 


per 


Assistant Project Manager level-0 in the pay matrix (Rs. 
5600-77500) with five years regular service in the 
grade. 


Note: Where juniors who have completed qualifying or 
eligibility service are being considered for promotion 
Their seniors would also be considered provided they are 
not short of the requisite qualifying service by more than 
half of such qualifying or eligibility or eligibility service 
or two years, whichever is less, and have successfully 
completed their probation period for promotion to the 
next higher grade along with their juniors who have 
already completed such qualifying or eligibility service. 
Deputation / absorption (Civilian Officers): Civilian 
Officers of the organised engineering service of the 
Central Government or other Departments or State 
Governments or public sector undertakings,- 


(a) Gi) holding analogous posts on regular basis. 


(ii) with two years regular service in posts level — 
0 in the pay matrix (Rs 5600 - Rs !77500). 


(b) possessing the experience and _ educational 
qualification prescribed for direct recruitment. 


Note |: The Departmental officers in the feeder category 
who are in the direct line of promotion shall not be 
eligible for consideration for appointment on deputation 
Similarly, deputationists shall not be eligible for 
consideration for appointment by promotion. 


Note 2: The period of deputation or contract including 
period of deputation or contract in another Ex-cadre post 
held immediately preceding this appointment in the same 
or some other organisation or department of the Central 
Government shall ordinarily not exceed three years. 


Note 3: The maximum age-limit for appointment by 
deputation shall not be exceeding fifty-six years as on the 
closing date of receipt of applications. 


(2) 


(3) 


Group ‘A’ Departmental Promotion Committee (for considering promotion) consisting of:- 


l. Chairman, recruitment and assessment centre. Defence Research 


and Development Organisation 


2. Director of personnel, Research and Development Organisation 
3. Chief Executive (civil works and estates), Research and Development 


4. An officer not below the rank of Scientist ‘D’ or equivalent from 


Department of Defence Research and Development 


Group ‘A’ Departmental Confirmation Committee (for considering confirmation) consisting 


of:- 


l. Director General, Defence Research and Development Organisation 


or Scientist ‘H’ 


2. Chief Executive (civil works and estates), Research and Development 


3. Director of personnel, Research and Development 


Not applicable. 
— Chairman; 
— Member; 


— Member; 


— Member. 


—Chairman; 


— Member; 


[भाग II—ave 4] भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 245 
Organisation — Member; 
4. An officer not below the rank of Scientist ‘D’ or equivalent from 

Department of Defence Research and Development — Member. 

() (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7) 

6. Deputy T3* General Level-0 in the | Selection. Not exceeding | (a) Essential: 
Construction (2023) Central pay marix thirty five (i) Bachelor Degree 
Engineer- * Subject to Service, (Rs 5600 - years of age. or equivalent in 
Cul रावत Group ‘A’, | 77500). (Relaxable for | Civil or Electrical 
Assistant dependent on Gazetted the or Mechanical 
Project work load. (Technical). Government Engineering or in 
Manager. servants upto | Architecture 


the age of five 
years in 
accordance 
with the 
instructions or 
orders issued 
by the Central 
Government 
from 

time to time). 
Note : The 
crucial date for 
determining 
the age-limit 
shall be the 
closing date 
for receipt of 
applications 
from 
candidates and 
not the closing 
date prescribed 
for those in 
Assam, 
Meghalaya, 
Arunachal 
Pradesh, 
Mizoram, 
Manipur, 
Nagaland, 
Tripura, 
Sikkim, 
Lahaul and 
Spiti District 
and Panji Sub- 
Division of 
Chamba 
District of 


Himachal 
Pradesh 


and the Union 
territories of 


Engineering or 
equivalent from a 
recognised 
University or 
institutions; 

or 
(ii) A minimum of 
three years 
Diploma or 
equivalent in 
engineering with 
minimum ten years 
relevant experience 
in planning and 
execution of civil 
works and estate 
management in the 
Central 
Government or 
State Governments 
or other 
Department or 
public sector 
undertakings. 


(b) Desirable: 


(i) Knowledge of 
scales of 
accommodation, 
formulation of civil 
works projects, 
preparation of 
project estimates or 
contract documents 
etc; 

(ii) Experience in 
designing or 
planning of 
technical 
administrative 
buildings of 
research and 
development 


246 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : JUNE 0, 2023/JYAISHTHA 20, 945 


[PART II—SEC. 4] 


Ladakh, establishments or 
Andaman and_ | laboratories. 
Nicobar 
Islands and 
Lakshadweep. 
(8) (9) (0) (l) 
Not applicable. | Two years for (i) fifty per cent. | Promotion: Assistant Construction Engineer level-7 in 
direct recruitment. | by direct the pay matrix (Rs. 44900-42400) with five years 
Note: There shall recruitment; regular service in the grade. 
be a mandatory (ii) twenty-five Note: Where juniors, who have completed qualifying 
induction training | per cent. by or eligibility service are being considered for promotion, 
of at least two promotion, failing | their seniors would also be considered provided they are 
weeks duration for | which by direct not short of the requisite qualifying or eligibility service 


successful 
completion of 
probation as 
prescribed by the 
Central 
Government. 


recruitment; and 
(iii) twenty-five 
per cent. by 
deputation / 
absorption failing 
which by direct 
recruitment. 


by more than half of such qualifying or eligibility service 
or two years, whichever is less, and have successfully 
completed their probation period for promotion to the 
next higher grade along with their juniors who have 
already completed such qualifying or eligibility service. 

Deputation / absorption (civilian officers) : Civilian 
officers of the organised engineering service of the 
Central Government or other Departments or State 
Government or public sector undertakings.- 


(a) G) holding analogous posts on regular basis in the 
parent cadre or department; or 


(ii) with five years regular service in posts level — 7 
in the pay matrix (Rs 44900 - 42400). 


(b) possessing the experience and educational 
qualification prescribed for direct recruitment under 
column (7). 


Note |: The Departmental officers in the feeder category 
who are in the direct line of promotion shall not be 
eligible for consideration for appointment on deputation. 
Similarly, deputationists shall not be eligible for 
consideration for appointment by promotion. 


Note 2: The period of deputation or contract including 
period of deputation or contract in another Ex-cadre post 
held immediately preceding this appointment in the same 
or some other organisation or department of the Central 
Government shall ordinarily not exceed three years. 

Note 3: The maximum age-limit for appointment by 
deputation shall not be exceeding fifty-six years as on the 
closing date of receipt of applications. 


(2) 


(3) 


Group ‘A’ Departmental Promotion Committee (for considering promotion) consisting of:- 


l. Chairman, recruitment and assessment centre Defence Research 


and Development Organisation 


2. Director of personnel, Defence Research and Development Organisation 


3. Chief Executive (civil works and estates) 


4. An officer not below the rank of Scientist ‘C’ or equivalent from 


Department of Defence Research and Development 


Not applicable. 
— Chairman; 
- Member; 


- Member; 


— Member. 


[भाग Il—avs 4] भारत का राजपत्र : जून 0, 2023/ज्येष्ठ 20, 945 247 


Group ‘A’ Departmental Confirmation Committee (for considering confirmation) consisting 
of:- 


l. Director General, Defence Research and Development Organisation 


or Scientist ‘H’ —Chairman; 
2. Chief Executive (civil works and estates), Research and Development — Member; 
3. Director of personnel, Research and Development Organisation — Member; 
4. An officer not below the rank of Scientist ‘C’ or equivalent from 
Department of defence research and development — Member. 
d) (2) (3) (4) (5) (6) (7) 
7. Assistant | 9* General Central | Level-7 inthe | Selection. | Not Not applicable. 
Construction | (2023) Service, pay matrix applicable. 
Engineer. * Subject to Group ‘B’, (Rs 44900- 
variation dependent | Gazetted 42400). 
on work load. (Technical). 
(8) (9) (0) (l) 
Not applicable. Not applicable. | By promotion. Promotion: Senior Engineer Assistant in level-6 in the pay 


matrix (Rs 35400-!2400) with three years regular service 
in the grade. 


Note: Where juniors who have completed qualifying or 
eligibility service are being considered for promotion, their 
seniors would also be considered provided they are not 
short of the requisite qualifying or eligibility service by 
more than half of such qualifying or eligibility service or 
two years, whichever is less and have successfully 
completed their probation period for promotion to the next 
higher grade along with their juniors who have already 
completed such qualifying or eligibility service. 


(2) (43) 
Group ‘A’ Departmental Promotion Committee (for considering promotion) consisting of:- Not applicable. 
. Director General, Defence Research and Development Organisation — Chairman; 
2. Director of personnel, Defence Research and Development Organisation -Member; 
3. Chief Executive (civil works and estates) - Member; 
4. An officer not below the rank of Scientist ‘B’ or equivalent from Department 
of defence research and development — Member. 


[F. No. DHRD/I7307/Civil Works/C/P/03/523/D(R&D) dated, 05 June, 2023] 
HARSHA RANI, Under Secy. 


Uploaded by Dte. of Printing at Government of India Press, Ring Road, Mayapuri, New Delhi-0064 
and Published by the Controller of Publications, Delhi-ll0054. manos uma vo 


